 Sorry for the run around. Can I buy you a drink?  It's not stopping the rest of these people. I got something to show you.  Let's get a table.  That's Colonel Robert Budahas. That photo was taken last year when he was a test pilot for the military, stationed at Ellens Air Base in Southwest Idaho. Four months ago, Colonel Budahas experienced a psychotic episode and barricaded himself in his home. Military police were called in. Budahas was removed and apparently hospitalised with treatment of his condition.  The military will not comment on the cause, nature or status. In fact, the military will not comment on Colonel Budahas at all.  Mrs. Budahas has neither seen nor heard from her husband in over four months. Her inquiries to the military have gone unanswered. Last month, she contacted the FBI and reported it as a kidnapping.  That's the sixty-four thousand dollar question, Scully.  Since 1963, six pilots have been listed as missing in action, from Ellens Air Base. The military will say only that these pilots accepted the risks of flying experimental aircraft.  There were other rumours too. I've been tracking this case since it came through the Boise regional office last month. Last week, for reasons I can't figure out, it was deprioritised. They shelved this case without an investigation, Scully.  So, you and I, are going to the spud state to investigate a little kidnapping.  Let's just say, this case has a, distinct smell to it, a certain, paranormal bouquet. Excuse me. 
 What?  Who are you?  How do you know about my work?  Who are you? Who do you work for?  I can't do that.  Yeah, I'm fine. Hello.  Yeah.  Uh-huh.  Yeah. 
 Er, listen, I don't want to talk about it on this line. I'll, I'll talk to you about it, on the flight out, OK? 
 Mrs. Budahas?  We're from the FBI.  What kinds of things?  Did he ever talk about his work?  Eeh, you said word gets around, I'm sorry, erm, have you ever heard of this, happening to anyone else?  Mrs. McLennen, has anyone ever offered to explain what caused this?  So what did you make of Uncle Fester down the block?  Yeah, but these guys aren't zoo animals, they're test pilots. They're not supposed to fold under pressure, they're supposed to thrive on it. 
 Yeah, that's the, er, unacknowledged codename for some new kind of defence department, surveillance project.  You saw the photos on the wall in there. This guy Budahas received a presidential commodation, he's never washed out of anything in his life. 
 I've been on hold with the base director of communications for fourty-five minutes, how about you?  Yeah, right.  Did you say Kissel? Colonel Kissel?  Can I talk with you? Special Agent Mulder, FBI.  Why don't you talk to us about Colonel Budahas?  We're just looking around. 
 We're not at liberty to comment.  Paul? Right? You've lived in this area a while, you ever seen a UFO?  But, if I wanted to talk to those UFO nuts, that you refered to earlier, where would I go? Who's the photographer? 
 You're kidding, where?  Put it on my tab. 
 What would the chances be, of someone like me, seeing a UFO?  I know. Let's go.  We got our own map, sucker. 
 Were you ever chased out before?  What do you think they are?  Do they look anything like this?  Later Dude! 
 Evidence.  Kids today, huh.  Why wouldn't I? 
 Ho-hoo. If you were that stoned, what.  Alright, I wanna show you something.  This is a photo, of a UFO that reportedly crashed in Roswell, New Mexico in 1947. Now I know, you don't believe that story but just hear me out. Now, Ellens Air Base, the same base that we're at right now, the same base, that for some strange reason, doesn't appear on your US government map, is supposedly, one of the six sites where parts from the wreckage were shipped.  No, planes built, using UFO technology. 
 Tell me, there isn't a remarkable resemblance.  You saw exactly what I saw in the sky tonight. What do you think they were?  Unidentified Flying Objects, I think that fits the description pretty well. Tell me I'm crazy.  You didn't come to raid my mini-bar, did ye?  What?  Mrs. Budahas, are you ok?  What? What's wrong? 
 It's ok, it's ok, just relax, wel, I'm Special Agent Mulder, from the FBI. We're out here investigating your disappearance Colonel Budahas. Wondering if you have any explanation of your whereabouts over the past four months.  Here, on base?  Colonel Budahas, do you mind if I ask you your birthdate?  And the names of your kids?  Green Bay fan.  Bet you remember the Superbowl of 68, huh? Don Shandler.  Colonel, Colonel Budahas, you're a, a pilot, isn't that right?  Bet you've flown just about everything with two wings. I got this hotshot pilot friend, who said that he could do Immelmann at a sustained eight g's, huh, is that possible?  I think they re-wired that man's brain. Some kind of selective memory drain.  Then you explain it to me.  This is not amnesia, I think it's something far more deliberate and insidious.  And neither does the technology to fly the aircraft we saw last night. Listen to me Scully, they can do this. That man, he should have known the answer to the question, it just wasn't in his head anymore. 
 To control information. I think that after his psychotic episode, Colonel Budahas became a security risk.  No, I think that men like Colonel Budahas are physiologically incapable of dealing with the stress of flying the aircraft we saw. Or doing those manoeuvres, at those speeds. I mean we're talking about a technology that is so sensitive and advanced, that it's taken almost fifty years to make it work. UFO technology, Scully. 
 Hold on. 
 You think if maybe we ignore him, he'll go away? 
 Guess not.  Special Agent Mulder, FBI. 
 You wanna tell me what this is about. 
 I don't think it was those kids they were chasing away from the base last night, I think it was us. They knew we were coming before we ever arrived. And they returned Colonel Budahas as a decoy. There's something I didn't tell you, Scully.  I was approached by a man in D.C. who warned me to stay away from this case, he didn't give me his name, and my phone was being tapped.  Why would they go to all this trouble? Out of a need for security. Security of what? I think there's a huge conspiracy here Scully. They've got a UFO here, I'm sure of it. And they'll do anything to keep it a secret, including sacrificing lives and minds of those pilots, because what if that secret got out.  No no, you're not thinking big enough, if it were true, it would be confirmation of the existence of extra terrestrial life.  Yes, but at what cost, when does the human cost become too high for the building of a better machine?  Aren't you even curious?  Aaerm, I gonna shower, I'll pack and then, we'll get outta here. 
 Hey, aren't you guys coming?  Ok, this spot you told me about where you watch the air show, how far is it?  Will I be able to find it?  And what about this other place you told me about, Yellow Base, where they hangar them.  Nooo. 
 Hi.  We came by to see how your husband was doing.  Do you think, maybe, we could see him.  They got to her Scully. They were here, they must have threatened her and Budahas..  Why?  I saw something I...  What is your interest?  I did see something, but it's gone, they took it from me, they erased it. You have to tell me what it was.  Because, all the evidence to the contrary, is not entirely dissuasive.  They're here, aren't they? 
SEPARATOR So why didn't they ask me?  Why would I make them so uncomfortable?  Reputation? I have a reputation?  Spooky? Do you think I'm spooky?  Grey.  Grey. You said green men, a Reticulan skin tone is actually grey, they're notorious for their extraction of terrestrial human livers. Due to iron depletion in the Reticulan galaxy.  Do you have any idea what liver and onions go for on Reticula? `scuse me. 
 This is the print I took yesterday from Usher's office, these others are from an X-file. Ten murders, Baltimore area, undetermined points of entry, each victim had their liver removed. These prints were discovered at five of the ten crime scenes.  Most likely, he's not aware of them. These two prints were lifted five years before he was born at Powhatan Mill. And these three were lifted probably, five years before his mother was even born.  And fingerprinting was just coming into it's own in 1903, but there was a murder involving an extracted liver.  Now that's five murders every thirty years. That makes two more to go this year.  What did we learn in our first day at the academy, Scully? Each fingerprint is unique, these are a perfect match.  No, of course not, I find no evidence of alien involvement.  And he should stick out in a crowd with ten inch fingers.  Our X-file dates back to 1903, we had it first.  You're down here too. Look, why don't we agree to this, they'll have their investigation, we'll have ours and never the twain shall meet. Agreed? You wouldn't shoot an unarmed man, would ya copper? 
 He's not coming back here, his thrill is derived from the challenge of unseemingly impossible entry. He's already beaten this place, if you'd read the X-file on the case, you'd come to the same conclusion.  Seeds? You're wasting your time, I'm going home.Scully, call for backup and get over here. In there. 
 You were right. 
 I had her ask it.  Scully's right, it is the guy.  He lied on questions eleven and thirteen, his electrodermal and cardiographic response nearly go off the chart.  Two murders with matching mo's occurred in Powhatan Mill in 1933, just look at the chart.  He's the guy.  Maybe I thought you caught the right guy. And maybe I run into so many people, who are hostile, just because they can't open their minds to the possibilties, that sometimes the need to mess with their heads, outweighs the millstone of humiliation. 
 Of course I was, in our investigations, you may not always agree with me but at least you respect the journey. And if you wanna continue working with them, I won't hold it against ye. 
 These are Eugene Tooms' prints. This is the fingerprint they took from Usher's office,it matches the old ones from the X-files. Obviously no match, but what if, somehow...
 Only thing I know for certain is, they let him go. What's the matter Colton, you worried I'm gonna solve your case? 
 It's Tooms. And he took something. I found him. How do we learn about the present, we look to the past. I think this is where it all began in 1903 on Exeter Street. Now look at the address of that first murder in 1903.
 Maybe, his neighbour played the victrola too loud.  What about the prints?  So what is this, the Anti-Waltons.  I think what we have to do is track Eugene Tooms, there's four down and one to go this year. If we don't get him right now, the next chance is in year.....  And you're gonna be head of the bureau by then. So I think you have to go through the census, I'm gonna plough through this century's marriage, birth, death certificates, and... You have any dramamine on you by any chance cos, these things make me seasick. Anything? Never was born, never married, never died.  Feel what, Frank?  Have you ever heard the name, Eugene Victor Tooms?  66 Exeter Street?  The old man was right, you can feel it.  Check this out. What's down here? Somebody having a garage sale. This is the shape of Werner's mantel. Does he live in here?  No, somebody made it. This is a nest, look, it's made out of rags and newspapers. Is there any way I can get it off my fingers quickly without betraying my cool exterior? 
 I don't think it's where he lives, I think it's where he hibernates.  Just listen, what if some genetic mutation could allow a man to awaken every thirty years.  And what if the five livers could provide him sustenance for that period. What if Tooms is some kind of, twentieth century, genetic mutant.  Well we're gonna need a surveillance team.  Well you go down town and see what you can fannagle, I'll keep watch. 
 It's about time.  Eugene Tooms, he's unarmed but consider him dangerous. Scully and I'll be back to relieve you in eight hours if he doesn't show, right here.  Where is everyone? Scully? 
[ MULDER'S ANSWER MACHINE ]This is Fox Mulder, I'm not here, leave a message. Dammit. 

 Dammit, ANSWER. 






 SCULLY! You alright?He's not gonna get his quota this year.
 Look at him, he's building another nest.  All these people putting bars on their windows, spending good money on hi-tech security systems, trying to feel safe. I look at this guy and I think, "It ain't enough". 



SEPARATOR Ok Scully, so we disagree, it's not the first time and it won't be the last.  This is the essence of science, you ask an impertinent question and you're on your way to a pertinent answer.  Because, the lizard baby, wasn't born anywhere near Lake Okobogee.  Bogee.  Okobogee.  If you know anything about trout fishing, or UFO hotspots.  Four sightings in 1967, August, including one by a national weather service plane.  This is a light blasted, digitally enhanced enlargement.  Try a girl scout with an instamatic. Four of the nine girls in the troupe claim to have seen something, five if you include the den mother. The Air Force said it was a weather balloon caught in a wind sheer. But there wasn't a weather balloon launched that day within seven hundred miles.  Now read me the names of those girl scouts from 1967. 
 It's the same Darlene Morris. Summer of 1967, the girl scout troupe?  Your name's on record at the center for UFO studies in Evanston, Illinois.  Yea, pilot for the national weather service made a similar sighting over the same area on the same day.  You, you said that erm, Kevin was there, the night it happened.  Do you think I might talk to him anyway?  Thanks. 
 Hey buddy! Mind if I sit down?  Thanks.  Your mom tells me you've been having nightmares.  Wanna tell me about `em?  Alright.  Whatta you doing?  Are you making something?  Can I take a look at it?  Thanks. 

 The TV? 
 `scuse me. Do you know where we could find Greg Randall?  Actually, we were hoping you could tell us.  Any ideas where he might have gone?  Hey, that's a nice tattoo, what is that?  Flying saucer. You don't really believe in that stuff do ya?  No, I think it's all just a bunch of crazy people howling at the moon.  No I haven't, why?  Well, if you explain to me what you're talking about, maybe I can help you out.  This is a document? Just looks like a bunch of ones and zeroes to me.  Tell me what it is.  It's your call Holtzman. So unless they tell me otherwise, I'm not accountable to anybody outside my sub-committee. I don't care if it's the NSA or the Vatican Police. 
 You're kidding.  Well sure, I'll let you know as soon as I find out. 
 Great. 
 You shouldn't have told them. They have no jurisdiction.  C'mon, how could an eight year old boy, who can bearly multiply, be a threat to national security? People call me paranoid.  You guys do really delicate work.  I'm not sure. 

 Almost like someone's switching channels, huh. 

 Mrs. Morris.  Mrs. Morris, please give me a minute to explain. 
 But your son, has seen something.  The boy's the key Scully, I know it.  Finding Ruby. Just think about it for a minute, this is a boy who is receiving all kinds of digitised data from a television screen.  No.  I think that Kevin is a conduit, of some kind.  A link, or a connection, to whoever, or whatever, took Ruby that night.  If there was an abduction, it's likely that Kevin was touched in some way. 
 That's why we're going to Lake Okobogee. Sure you were Tessa.  You knew they were meeting, so you sat there and you waited for them. You were angry and you were jealous.  You sat there and you waited and when they showed, you killed him first, isn't that how it went?  You snuck up from behind him and you shot him in the back,  BAAMMM.  And then you killed Ruby,  BAAMMM.  What was she doing right before she died Tessa? Was she pleading for her life? Was she running away?  Where's she buried Tessa?  You don't know where you buried her Tessa. 
 You didn't?  Well how would you know that Tessa, if you weren't there yourself. 
 Which is?  Is that your conclusion or the conclusion of the Sioux City Sheriff's Department?  They're wasting their time.  Why not, what if Ruby never did show up that night?  Because something was out there in those woods.  I can't do that. 
 To talk to the boy.  Well, I've gotta see him.  Come with me or don't come with me but until they find a body, I'm not giving up on that girl. 
 Hello?  Mrs. Morris?  I don't know.  What is it?  You know when I was a kid, I had this ritual. I closed my eyes before I walked into my room, cause I thought that one day when I opened them my sister would be there. Just lying in bed, like nothing ever happened. You know I'm still walking into that room, everyday of my life.  Scully.  DARLENE! 
 Are you ok?  Where's Kevin?  KEVIN! You ok? Kevin I'm sorry but, I don't...  Kevin I don't think she is. I know how much you want it to be her, I did too.  SCULLY! 
 I'll get help. 
 Any ideas what caused the coma?  By any chance was there attendant reduction in the lymphocyte population or a release of gluco-cordacoids? 
 They're symptoms of prolonged weightlessness. Shuttle astronauts have reported similar imbalances. 
 Where were you Ruby? Can you tell us?  Who told you?  Ruby, who told you?  I know how dis-oriented she must seem right now, but in a couple of weeks, maybe even a few days, we could..  She should be encouraged to tell her story, not to keep it inside, it's important that you let her.  But she will remember one day, one way or another, even if it's only in dreams. And when she does, she's gonna wanna talk about it, she's gonna need to talk about it.  But it was the truth Darlene.  It doesn't have to be that way for Ruby.  Is that what you're gonna tell Kevin?  Yeah, they're open but it's like, nothing's happening.  I can't.  No, but I can hear her.  She's calling out my name, over and over again.  She's crying out for help but I can't help her. I can't move.   I know I should be but I'm not.  Because of the voice.  The voice in my head. 
 Not to be afraid. It's telling me no harm will come to her, and that one day she'll return.  I want to believe.SEPARATOR This woman claims to have been taken aboard a spaceship and held in an anti-gravity chamber without food and water for three days.  What's that?  Where in New Jersey?  Not an uncommon place to lose a body part. They think it's the mob?  You feeling lucky Scully?  Ever hear of something called The Jersey Devil? 
 Read the file about the case in 1947. 
 1947, family watches dad get dragged off into the woods, cops find dad with a few appendages gnawed off. Cops corner a large naked man in the woods and gun `im down.  Autopsy shows human flesh and bones in the man's large intestine. A beast man.  Requisition for a car please.  No, the original disappeared from the Patterson PD's files a few years after the incident. But there is a statement from the attending pathologist.  I heard the same story when I was a kid too, funny thing is, I believed it.  Thanks Doreen.  Fact is, we got a cannibalised body in New Jersey, someone or something out there is hungry. 
 So what's eating that guy?  Yeah, chances are he's without a clue. He'll probably be scratching his head when they bring the next body in.  Hey whatta you say, we grab a hotel, take in a floor show, drop a few quarters in the slot, do a little digging on this case.  Ok, we can skip the floor show.  What you gotta date? SCULLY: No, I have my godson's birthday party at 6:30.  What are you doing? A little poking around, maybe make a weekend out of it. 
 Victim was a homeless man, you get many of them wandering around out here?  Scared? Of what?  People say that's just a myth.  What do you think?  Really. You never saw him again?  You think it might be what's responsible for the body you found? 
 Yeah.  How far is it into town from here?  I'm staying at the Galaxy Gateway for the next couple of days, if you think of anything, will you call me?  Did anybody here know Roger Crockett?  He was murdered two days ago.  Ma'am, can I..  Roger Crockett? Anybody? 
 Did you know Roger Crockett?  Did you hear how he died?  Any ideas who might've done it?  No, I'm FBI.  Ok. 
 What is this?  Does it mean anything to you?  Where?  Here? Are you hustling me?  Who do you think it is?  Has anybody else seen it?  Anybody told the cops?  Where're you sleeping tonight?  You know the er, The Galaxy Gateway?  Room 756. Go ahead.  Yeah, they do. You got a man up on that roof.  Hey back off.  I'm telling you, there's a man up on that roof.  Enjoying the night life here in beautiful Atlantic City.  That's good, let's go see her together, and while we're at it, why don't we add withholding evidence to the list.  Statements given to you describing something stalking the back streets of Atlantic City.  Why else would you be sweeping the streets tonight? You know it's out there.  Oh is that your job, or is it to keep the dice rolling, keep the tour buses rolling in. You can't fill those casinos, this town disappears like a quarter down the slot.  I've seen it.  Who's going to be responsible when you lose your first tourist, Detective? You are.  I'm not far from where you left me.  Er Scully, you got anything happening this morning?  That's a guy getting sick.  You gonna rag on me or you gonna take me to get something to eat?  It moved like a cat, quick and graceful. There's no way a human could've got up on the roof that fast.  What?  They dropped the charges, that guy Thompson, he ran me through the system just to spite me.  I saw it, it's exactly the way the ranger described it, the way it moved, the way it sniffed the air. It's come out of the woods, probably in search of food.  It was peeking through the garbage Scully, if it was a man-eater, why didn't it come after me? Probably felt threatened in some way..  But you do believe that I saw something, don't ye?  I still got a hotel room I'm paying for. SCULLY: Yeah well, I have got to get back to Washington by 7:30, so er.. Another birthday party?  Can you cancel?  I have a life! 
 Why is that?  What's this chart? 
 Why? 
 So we kill other species in order to survive.  But what if something entered the food chain above us? 
 But, but what if through some fluke of nature, a human was born, who reverted to it's most animal instincts, a kind of carnivorous neanderthal. Wouldn't he occupy a space above us on the food chain?  Right, yeah, an.and, and haven't there been cases were, men have been raised in the wilderness by animals who have no language and hunt like predators?  But even when faced with extinction?  Yea, highly unlikely, but not outside the realm of extreme possibility?  They're going to try and sweep this whole thing under the carpet.  Any publicity and you're got the streets crawling with the kind of people who aren't here to play the crap tables. Word gets out there's something still on the loose, forget it.  The body they found was a male, there's a fifty-fifty chance there was a mate. We may never know unless we find out ourselves.  This thing has no fear of heights. We'll stay together and start with the lower floors. How much time will that dart give us?  What if it is a female Scully? How close is she to you or me? Does she feel emotion? Or are her days just spent looking for food?  Eight million years out of Africa, I don't think we're all that different. 
 While we over-populate the world and create new technologies to kill each other with. Maybe we're just beasts with big brains.  What?  Scully. 
 You should've seen her, she was beautiful.  She could've torn my head off Scully but she didn't, she sensed that I wasn't a threat..  What?  What?  Well tell him he's got a real live neanderthal on the loose. She was young, I, I, I don't know...It's hard to say exactly what, what, what...  That is such crap, you can.. 
 Let's go. 
 You could take her alive.  Can you reach her from here?  Why did you have to kill her?  Good luck. 
 There would have been offspring.  She was just protecting her children Scully, it all makes sense.  The male dies and she comes out of the woods in search of food.  Thanks for the offer but I've got an appointment at the Smithsonian with.. ...an ethno-biologist, I can't wait to tell him about this.  Mulder, yeah just a second, it's for you. 
 Requisition for a car please Fran. Thank you.  Who was that on the phone?  A guy. Same guy as the guy you had dinner with the other night?  You gonna have dinner with him again?  No interest? 
 Thanks Fran.  What are you doing?  Don't you have a life Scully?  Eight million years out of Africa. 
SEPARATOR You're not FBI, are you?  Time of death?   Where did you find them?  Look, at least tell us the mode of transport. That might tell us why the bodies haven't cooled.  Hey, you called us down here. If you want some answers you have to give some.   Thank you.  Who are these guys?   Ah, uh. Never.  I'd say you people already suffer from full denial. 
 I would never lie. I willfully participated in a campaign of misinformation.  NSA, CIA, some convert organization Congress will uncover in the next scandal. It's not important who they are but what they have and I'm sure they have no idea because they pulled us in. I have X Files. Each case with an element of what we saw tonight. Residual electrostatic charge, internal mutilation without any external causality - but none has all the elements combined in one case.  Psychokinetic manipulation.  The Russians were doing studies on it. The Chinese still are. Their findings are kept secret. (They get into an elevator)  That's 60 air minutes.  There. Back up.  Look at that.   Maybe, maybe not.  That leaves only one person we know we can talk to. Miss Lauren Kyte, please.  I'm Agent Fox Mulder and this is Agent Dana Scully. We're with the Federal Bureau of Investigation. Do you mind if we come in?  Thank you. We won't be long. 
 Can you tell us what happened that night?  They were found dead.   Does that mean you know?  When you can tell me, this is the number where I can be reached at anytime, ok?  And somehow crushing their necks?   Packing, running away, from what?   Hang on!  You ok?  Hi. The paramedics check you out?  Mine's more IRS sized.  Yeah, it's brand new. Only a 100 miles.  Mechanic said everything is in proper order. Nothing cut, nothing greased. Check out the lights.  They're not. The filaments are heated due to massive levels of electrostatic charge. Just like the bodies at the morgue. And isn't it interesting that Lauren Kyte was present at both incidents?  What if it's possible somehow to raise a body's electrostatic charge to levels we've been seeing and use that energy to affect objects?  Well there's evidence of this all through the X Files. Furniture moving untouched, objects levitating, unexplained electrical discharges. Frequently people who have psychokinetic power are unaware of their own capability.  Either that or a poltergeist.  They may be.  A little upset over losing a parking space, wouldn't you say? So, who is Howard Graves anyway? She was his secretary. That's three people dead in the last month all associated with Lauren Kyte. 
 Excuse me, Sir? Is there an office here so that I can get information on those people?  Do you know how Sarah Lynn is related to Howard Graves?  Thank you, Sir.  If she'd lived, she'd be Lauren's age. 
 Not necessarily. Do you know how difficult it is to fake your own death? Only one man has pulled it off, Elvis.  You may be right.   Sure, all you got to do is prove that Howard Graves is still alive. 
 I don't suppose you ran any dental conformation?  Who made positive ID on the body?   But Howard Graves was cremated. There would be no way to run a dental check or to get a DNA sample.  Why?  Do you know who this is?   We were following leads pertaining to an X File.  Then we have nothing more to talk about.   How's Lauren Kyte involved?  My advise to you. Don't get rough with her. LATER  WOMAN: That was a waste of time. 
 Ok, then you're free to go.   Why? Because of Howard Graves?  I know. He's watching over you, isn't he? LATER  LAUREN: I don't know if you've ever been a secretary. Sometimes your boss can talk as if you weren't even in the room, which can hurt, you know? Sometimes... you're all he has to talk to. Which is how it was all the time with me and Howard. One night, late, I went into his office. He was crying, more scared than sad. The Pentagon contracts were being canceled, the company was going under, he felt personally responsible for each of his employees... seeing and feeling their fear every day... it really wore him down. Then this one time, Dorland came with that group... that Mid East group... Isfahan, that terrorist group. They'd buy parts at an outrageous price. Not just once, but for as long as they could get away with it. That night Howard was crying, he'd just found out the Isfahan had just claimed responsibility for killing a couple of sailors in Florida. He was never the same. And I thought that was why he killed himself. But he didn't... I saw ... Howard showed me how Dorland had him killed. Made it look like a suicide because he see Howard was going to put an end to the deal. We don't have him. He's not even breaking a sweat.   Lauren, it's over. We have to go. (She looks around the room as Dorland enters.) What we're looking for isn't here. (Lauren takes a letter opener from the desk and smashes the glass in a picture frame and takes out the photo.)  Lauren, No! (Dorland pushes her away and he is pushed against the wall by Howard. The door slams shut. Dorland starts gasping at his neck. He can't breathe.  Get down. (Outside the office, Scully hears the commotion and runs back to Dorland's office door. It's locked.)  I guess what we're looking for is here. Where are you going?  Boy, she's in a rush to get out of here.  Hey, Scully. Do you believe in the afterlife?  Have you ever seen the liberty bell?  You know, I've been to Philadelphia a 100 times and I've never seen it.  Yeah,  but I'd really like to go.  I don't know. How late do you think they stay open?SEPARATOR  Jerry?  Jerry and I worked together in Violent Crimes.  So, Jerry, what are you doing here?  Look, Jerry. I'd like to help you out, but we're not on general assignment.  You won't drop the ball.  Yeah, but Jerry ...  I'm a pain in the ass to work with.  I'm not a pain in the ass? We had different career goals. Jerry wanted the fifth floor.  I was gunning for a basement office with no heat or windows. 
 He ran into a little bad luck in Atlanta working hate crimes.  He misplaced a piece of evidence, bagged and everything. Sent it to the cleaners. By the time he got it back, a federal judge had lost both his hands and his right eye. 
 Uh-huh.  How do you like that? A politically correct elevator.  You okay?  The, uh, servo switch. Could it have been moved manually?  If somebody wanted to override the COS, what would they ...?  Well, we're going to need a list of all the people with that kind of know how.  Would you be on it?  What about the phone lines? Does the COS monitor all phone calls?  I was just wondering.  Phone's off the hook.  Maybe Drake was talking to someone right before he did his Ben Franklin impersonation.  Come in.  I'm just looking for my profile notes.  They were right here. I'm telling you.   Forget it, no.  Jerry, what the hell are you doing?  Jerry, that was my profile.  Jerry, you went into my office and you stole my work.  He apologized - in his own way.  One name? Brad Wilczek?  That just seems too obvious. To kill Drake would be so brazenly egomaniacal.  Fully. 
 So this is what a 220 IQ and a $400 million severance settlement buys you. 
 That's from the Greek, isn't it? Um, "I learn things."  Mr. Wilczek, is this system related to the one in your corporate building?  In your opinion, how many people know the system well enough to override it?  Could someone have hacked into the system?   Will you give me a second?   All you had to do was ask. I would've helped you with the profile.  What *what's* like?  Yea ...  That was bad luck. That could have happened to anybody.  Don't run yourself down, Jerry. You're a good agent. We did some good work together.  That's not how it was.  I'm saying that both voices are Brad Wilczek's. He may have disguised his voice electronically, but he couldn't alter the form that is unique to his own speech patterns.  I'll go with you.  All right. 
 I don't think Wilczek did it.  It doesn't make sense. Why would he go back to Eurisko?  If you were going to destroy evidence, would you pose for the cameras? 
 I think Wilczek is smarter than this.   Yeah, I know.  I ordered the subpoena.  What are you talking about?  Thanks for coming.  I need to know why Brad Wilczek is the subject of a code five investigation. What the Defense Department wants with him.  Software.  What kind of software?  I thought it was only theoretical.  An adaptive network?  I want you to tell me why you're willing to spend the rest of your life in prison for a crime you didn't commit.  I know you're innocent. You're protecting a machine -- the Central Operating System at Eurisko.  Then what?  Oppenheimer may have regretted his actions but he never denied responsibility for them.  But your machine killed Drake. And it killed my friend.  And you talk about morality. You're afraid of the government but you're willing to accept the risk that your machine will kill again.  What about a third option. You created that machine. Now you tell me how to destroy it. Wilczek can create a virus that will destroy the system.  But it's the only thing that makes sense. The COS project was posting big losses for Eurisko and Drake was about to terminate the program.  Self-preservation. It's the primary instinct of all sentient beings.  Then why was our government trying to usurp Wilczek's research?  You're probably right.   To talk to someone. 
 How much time do you need? Scully, what are you doing here?  It's the machine.  You remember the Trojan Horse?  
  Open, Sesame!  
 Oh, what the - - 
 So much for the element of surprise. What do you say we take the stairs? 
 28 down, one to go.   Trick or treat. 
 No!   I don't want to make the same mistake Drake made.    What are you looking at?  
 There should be a way for you to drop down and open the door. 
  Come on, Scully. 

 Scully?   Where's the B port?  Damn. 

 Now I can put in the virus.  Defense Department?  Don't listen to him.  The machine's a monster, Scully. It's already killed two people. They won't be able to handle it any better than Wilczek did.  I checked with Congressman Klebanon and the Department of Corrections Subcommittee. I even petitioned the Attorney General's office.  They can't just take a man like Brad Wilczek without an explanation.  Where is he?  Wilczek won't deal. He'll never work for them.  What else could I have done?  The Department of Defense still hasn't found anything? SEPARATOR Fouts retired in '87, didn't he?  Agent Mulder and Agent Scully, you? 
 San Diego? You get much of a chance to study ice down there?  Mulder, nice to meet you.  Hi.  What for?   It's me!   It's you.  Something wrong?  Yeah.  Bear? See if you can get the power started.  Before we touch anything, we have to thoroughly document the scene. (They start off towards the back. Scully takes out her camera.) That's what they were drilling for. Quarter of a million years melting away in a couple of days.  It's the generator.  Yeah, he didn't break the skin. Bear, you okay?  What could that mean?  Danny? (He walks over to Murphy, who is looking at a paper, pen in mouth and listening to his tape player.)Danny.(He waves his hand in front of Murphy's face, who is startled. He takes out his earphones.) My interpretation of satellite remote sensing photos is a little rusty. (He shows Murphy an overhead picture of a vast arctic landscape.) I also found this data and if I'm reading it correctly, the team actually found the ice sheet to be twice that depth.  What'd you find?  Unless a foreign object was introduced into that environment.  Holy... Scully. (He motions to Scully, who looks in the scope. Bear walks to the desk.) Unless that's how it lives. (Bear walks over.) If those bodies are infected with an unknown organism, we can't take them back. We can't go back without proper quarantine procedures. We can't risk bringing back the next plague.  It didn't break the skin -  Okay, anyone got the morning sports section handy? (Bear picks up a jar.) You can't go, the dog bit you. (Bear turns around and gets in his face.) We have to. We can't risk infecting the population.  Take a vote. Whoever believes we should confine Bear until he agrees to an examination? (Mulder, Scully and Murphy raise their hands.)All right.(Mulder takes out his gun as Bear walks in carrying two bags.)Bear, we just want to check you out. If we don't find any trace of the parasite or the virus, we'll all go.(They all look at Bear. He pauses, looks at Mulder's gun, and walks over to the desk.) Murphy, get a rope!  We don't know enough about it!  This is the A.I.C.P. Investigative Team calling Doolittle Airfield, come in.  This is Agent Mulder, we have a serious biological hazard. Request air pick-up and quarantine procedures, over. (Static.)Come in, Doolittle Airfield. We were told we would have three clear days of weather, over.  Is Bear in any condition to fly? We don't get out in an hour, we don't get out for days. (Scully and Hodge look at each other. They are wiping the blood of their hands. Scully looks back at Mulder.) Have you figured out how it's transmitted yet?  Were they all in the spine?  You're saying it's possible that the worm makes you want to kill other people, which is maybe what happened to the first team.  Maybe they did it to save us. (Mulder walks off. There is an uncomfortable pause. As the storm ravages the base, Scully checks the bodys. She zips up the bodybag as Mulder walks in.) Just some sleep, huh?  We're all wired and hypersensitive, it'll be good to get a fresh start in the morning.  I don't know if we should kill it. (She turns back, shocked.)This area of the ice sheet was formed over a meteor crater. The worm lived in ammonia. It survived sub-zero temperatures. Theorists in alternative life-designs believe in ammonia-supported life systems on planets with freezing temperatures. The meteor that crashed here a quarter of a million years ago may have carried that type of life to earth.  Exactly. But what do we know about it? This organism might be lying dormant in another crater.  But if we do kill it now, we may never know how to stop it or anything like it in the future. (In the laboratory, Murphy puts on his earphones and works. Hodge and DaSilva stand around listening to Scully and Mulder, who can be heard yelling mostly illegibly in the background.) Do we have the right to destroy an organism which can provide... (trails off)  How do you know it can't be contained?  Let's all just settle down, it's been a long hard day. We're all tired and scared. Let's not all turn on one another.  Maybe we should all get some sleep.  Before anyone passes judgement, may I remind you we are in the Arctic. (Scully checks out DaSilva, who has her arms raised as Scully checks for spots. We can only see DaSilva's back, though it is apparent that she is naked. Scully lowers her arm, holds her hand and smiles. They both sigh in relief. All five start off to their rooms, carrying flashlights down the hall.) Good night, Scully.  Don't forget, the spots on the dog went away. (Mulder closes his door. Scully goes into her room, turns on the light, and sets her bags and flashlight down on the bed. She goes over and turns on the wall lamp. She looks at a picture of the arctic team. She thinks for a moment, then moves the dresser in front of the door. She sits down next to it against the wall and curls up. Murphy listens to the radio, eyeing the door intently.) Murphy's dead.  I found him like this. I heard one of the doors close, I came out to check it out. It's one of you.  I don't have any of the symptoms.  It was one of you! (Mulder starts towards Hodge but Scully gets between them.) What, so he can doctor the results? I'm not gonna let him stick a needle in me! He could be infected!  I'm not turning my back on anyone! As far as I'm concerned, you're all infected! (Mulder walks back slowly, waving his gun around. Hodge inches over to the counter.) Scully, get that gun off me!  Put it down!  Scully! For God sakes, it's me!  In here, I'll be safer than you. (Scully slides the door shut and bolts it. She leans against the door, thinking about what she has done. She starts off, looks back at the bolt, then walks off. Walking into the lab, she sees DaSilva asleep at the desk. Gun in hand, she walks over quietly and moves the back of her shirt down, trying to get a look at her neck. Hodge comes in and grabs her hand. DaSilva wakes up with a short scream.) It's just you?  It's one of them.  So?  You give me one worm, you'll infect me.  (whispering) I would have but you pulled a gun on me. Now I don't trust them. I wanted to trust you.  So is she.  Bastards! No! (DaSilva gets the worm with the forceps and dangles it above Mulder's ear. She holds his head down by the hair.)Ah! Stop... no!(Hodge looks at DaSilva and notices a bump moving around on the back of her neck. Scully! (He opens the door.)It's DaSilva!(She drops the drill bit and they run after her. Hodge picks the worm up off the floor with the forceps. DaSilva runs into the lab, screaming hysterically. She opens a door and throws some jars out, then knocks over any lab equipment near her. Mulder runs in as DaSilva takes the gun in the evidence bag out of the drawer. She takes the gun out and Mulder tackles her as she fires at him. Scully runs in and they hold her down. Hodge walks in slowly.) Do it!  I'm going back to the site. This time, I'm going fully prepared with proper equipment. There's still a lot of research to be done on it's genetic structure, on it's origin...  Know what? 
 It's still there, Scully. 200,000 years down in the ice. SEPARATOR Just that they worked for NASA.  They wanted to talk to somebody from the FBI.  I have no idea.  It's beginning to look that way. 
 Fox Mulder...  In what capacity?  Do you have evidence of sabotage?  Evidence of tampering?  Does anybody share your suspicions?  Well, if you were a terrorist, there probably isn't a more potent symbol of American progress and prosperity. And if you're an opponent of big science, NASA itself represents a vast money trench that exists outside the crucible and debate of the democratic process. And of course there are those futurists who believe the Space Shuttle is a rusty old bucket that should be mothballed. A dinosaur spacecraft built in the 70's by scientists setting their sights on space in an ever declining scale.  Not to mention certain fringe elements who accuse our government itself of space sabotage. The failure of the Hubble Telescope and the Mars Observer are directly connected to a conspiracy to deny us evidence.  Alien civilizations.  I have to admit, that fulfilled one of my boyhood fantasies.  Come on, Scully. You have to admit that was exciting. Mission control........countdown.  What happened?  They have a press blackout in effect. Chances are, the media doesn't know about it.  I don't know. Things go wrong all the time.  Usually.   The Orbiter maneuvering system has malfunctioned. Without it they can't rotate the shuttle. They need to rotate it away from the sun to keep the Orbiter cool.  Where's Col. Belt?  Where's that?  I'm a federal agent. Come on out of there. (Scully and Michelle join Mulder. Computer Tech Geek with Glasses comes out of the corner) What are you doing in here?  Did you see anybody else in here? (CTGG shakes his head, lights come back on) Okay, call security. I want a search of the premises. I don't want anybody coming in or out of this building who doesn't have proper clearance.  They're cutting off ground control to the Orbiter. The astronauts will be flying the shuttle all by themselves.  They cut off contact with the shuttle.   Col. Belt? Col. Belt? Can I talk to you for a moment?  You've got no argument from me, sir. You're true American heroes.  Sir, I have to ask. I'm sorry, it's my job. Do you think someone is sabotaging the shuttle?   That's the liquid O2 leaking out into space. The exact same thing happened to Col. Belt on an Apollo mission.  We'll find Col. Belt.  She doesn't know how serious the leak is.  Col. Belt's been up there in the same situation before. He'll know better than anybody else what to do. He's got to make the decisions.  Col. Belt? Col. Belt!  Col. Belt. Are you all right?  They need you down at Mission Control, sir. There's been another accident. You don't know that.  He saved their lives earlier.  And you think killing those astronauts isn't going to have the same effect?  He doesn't want those men to die.  I know it. I'm sure of it.  And he may be the only person who can get them down alive. Now how can you be certain that what he's doing isn't the right thing? That what he's doing isn't going to save their lives? Now I need access to you records... in a hurry. 
  I need everything on the Hubble Telescope, the Mars Observer, the Shuttle Challenger, and the current Orbiter mission.  X-rays, diagrams, schematics - - any proof that Belt knew about a sabotage.  This is from the Challenger. It's the O ring fitting that failed dated January 21, 1986. That's one week before the space shuttle blew up. And the analysis was ordered by Col. Belt.  Something weird is going on here, Scully.  Where is he?  Get a doctor.  How can we help you, Col.?  Strap him down.  No.  He's trying to tell us something. Col. Belt.  (Holding up his finger) Col. Belt, I want you to focus. Focus your breathing. Focus your pain. (Oh, this scene is bad) Right here.  Focus. (Belt calms) Now you're focused. Right here. Now you're going to save those astronauts and you're going to tell me how to do it.  How do you know it can't survive?  How has it been damaged?  Did you sabotage the shuttle?  Stop who?  Stop who?  Who?  They're bringing the shuttle down. You said the shuttle would burn up on reentry. Is there anything we can do to save it?  Change the trajectory to what?   You've to change the reentry trajectory.  You've got to change it to 35 degrees.  Col. Belt- - -  It's your only shot.  Something had possessed him. Something he must have seen out there in space.  I don't think he ever really knew exactly how it was working through him or that he ever knew...that he was...responsible for his own actions.  You saw what I saw, Scully. I think he was trying to warn her. I think that he sent Michelle those x-rays like he was trying to reach out to her without quite knowing why, as if...his own instinctual impulse was to save those men.  Hey, Scully, we send those men up into space to unlock the doors of the universe, and we don't even know what's behind them. I think what ever it was, he took it with him. And in the end that was the only way he knew how to stop it.  He gave his own life. As an astronaut, that was something he was prepared to do.SEPARATOR I think you knocked out a filling.  Since when does taking pictures put anyone's life at risk?  That's a quarantine? Is that what you call this?  Thats a lot of firepower just to protect mother nature.  You've got a downed craft in those woods, sir. And troops carrying live rounds ! We both know what's out there! Go ahead.  What makes you so sure that something's out there?  I didn't order room service.  Did you meet Max?  Max from NICAP.  Oh, they must have released him. Another intrepid soul in seach of a close enounter.  What else?  So what else is new?  Because I know what I saw Scully. There weren't train tracks anywhere near that site. So how could it have been a derailed container?  OK. I'm all ears. What was it?  You really believe that story..?  A highly classified lie.  They're searching for someone Scully.  You think they'd roll out all of this material for one Libyan fighter jock?  Besides, no human pilot walked away from the wreckage I saw.  Maybe. As long as we're here in beuartiful downtown Townsend, why not?  That gives us 24 hours to investigate.  "The Last Detail" starring Dana Scully 
 Looks like housekeeping hasn't been here yet.  SH... 
 Max?  Max?  Know what?  But you don't know me. Last night is the first time you've laid eyes on me.  Following my career? How?  How did you recognize me?  I published that under a pseudonym.  I didn't think anyone was really paying attention   *Enigmatic* Dr. Scully. Mrs. Wright? Hi. I'm Fox Mulder. This is Dana Scully. We're from the FBI. We'd like to ask you a few questions about your husband.  Why won't you let us help you?   Hey, Max.  Max! 
 Max?  What is that, blood? Mulder and Scully stand in front of the scanner, looking and listening. Come on.  Think about is Scully. Max is a gypsy. A nomad, right?  So he intercepted Deputy Wright's last call to his dispatcher. Which means he was here in Townsend Wisconsin the night of the crash. Of all the places he could of been, he was right here. Don't you think thats more than a coincidence. If Max was abducted that would go a long way to explaining his obsession. And if we've figured it out, you can be sure Col. Henderson has as well. Do you have the keys? 
 Max?  Max. Its alright.  Come on. Come on, Max.  I'm hear to help you.  I know.  I won't let them take you. Come on, Max. Come with me.  Max! Max! MAX! 
 He's gone. They got to him first. They beat us Colonel.  Do you hear that sound Scully?  Hammer and nails. They're building a gallows in the town square. Don't worry.  It was only a matter of time.  I'm surprised I lasted this long.   I'll break a leg. 
 Over a dozen men lost their lives and you want me to respond to issues of protocol?  Because I knew it wouldn't be forthcoming.   A cover up was underway...   Oh, toxic contamination? Are we back in that? You read my report, explain the disapearance of Max Fenig.  I have further evidence to support my conclusions -- X-rays taken while Mr. Fenig was institutionalized show an object lodged in his cerrebelum   The man was abducted. We all know it. Everybody in this room knows it.  Then what can I say?  How can I disprove lies that are stamped with an official seal?  You can deny all the things I've seen. All the things I've discovered. But not for much longer. Because too many others know what's happening out there. And no one. No government agency has jurisdiction over the truth. 
SEPARATOR I'd say the man was running on empty.  Any evidence would have be washed away by yesterday's rain.  Are you at all familiar with the phenomena of cattle mutilations? 
 Since 1967, over 34 states have reported unsolved cases of cattle mutilations. Trace evidence is remarkably similar. Incision marks of surgical precision. The area around the mouth and often the sexual organs have been removed. There's a substantial degree of blood loss but not a trace of blood at the scene.  Exsanguination. If you were to stick a needle into the jugular of any living creature, the heart itself would act as a pump. These animals have had their jugulars punctured the same as the man in Greenwich, CT. Although this is the first time I've ever seen it on a human being.  The ME found traces of digitalis, a South American plant that can be used as a paralytic drug.  Witnesses often relate time loss. We've seen this in abduction cases. That might explain why the girl can't remember anything.  For the same reason we cut up frogs and monkeys. Besides, they seem to have stepped up their interest. 
 Has she spoken about it?  Any nightmares?  Nice bunny, Teena. Can we talk about what happened that day? About what happened in the back yard? 
 Yeah? Do you remember... any strange sounds or lights or anything like that?  Can you tell me more about the Red Lightening?  Had you ever seen anything like that before? 
 Yeah? When?  Why were these men after your Dad?  It's like looking at a mirror image.  Puncture wounds? SCULLY: Ah... yes. On the jugular. Time of death was estimated at 2:30 p.m. Same day, only three hours earlier than the Simmons murder. That's Pacific standard time. That makes it the exact same moment.  No. Serial killers seldom work in pairs. And when they do, they kill together not separately.  Is Reardon's daughter nearby when he was murdered? 
 When will they be back? 
 Even money... she'll remember Red Lightening. Someone or something, Scully.  Maybe they weren't looking in the right direction.   You live here, Cindy?  Cindy really is a beautiful little girl, Mrs. Reardon.  Is she an only child? 
 Was she the only child delivered at that birth?  Mrs. Reardon, have you ever seen this man before?  No.  No... he... he did... he didn't...  In vitro fertilization? 
 At which clinic?  Thanks. I don't know. The only thing similar about these girls doesn't seem to be their appearance.  Who both just happened to see their father's exsanguinated. I'd like to get the odds on that in Vegas. 
 One girl was just abducted.  Potato, potahto. 
 The murders were committed by the same person or persons. Part of the pattern involves kidnaping the daughter.  I'm going to keep an eye on the girl. You check out the clinic. See if the Simmons were enrolled in the same fertility program. 
 Okay. 
 Maybe now she's trying to erase the results? 
 So you think this is a vendetta that she and a colleague have against the Stapes Center? 
 I'll tell you what... I'm going to sleep on it and we'll talk about it in the morning. 
 No, I'm not.  What's a girl? 
 No, I have... there's a movie I want to watch on TV. Sleep tight. See you in the morning. Yes. What are you doing here? 
 No you haven't.  Agents Mulder and Scully. We're here to see Eve 6.  What are those?  Hello?   They're probably there for a good reason.  Where are the others? The other Adams and the Eves?  Heightened psychosis.  Dr. Kendrick was using the clinic to carry on the Lichfield Experiment. She was cloning herself. Suppose Eve 6 is right and there are two other Eves out there. That could account for the two identical murders occurring at exactly the same time. Sally Kendrick does have an accomplice. Herself.  No. No, no, no. It seems the two remaining Eves are doing away with the parents in order to keep Teena and Cindy in the family. I hope not. 
 I'll take the back. 
 FBI. I'm armed.  Eve 7 holding Cindy stops and looks at him. She's wearing a dark sweatshirt with the hood over her head. Which one are you? Eve 7 or Eve 8? 
 Mrs. Reardon, the fact that Kendrick and her accomplice murdered the fathers and abducted the girls means they want them alive. I'm sure Cindy's alive and we'll find her. 
 That was a motel manager in Port Reyes that says he's got a guest that matches Sally Kendrick's description.  She might have ditched it. The manager said this woman checked in with a little girl. That she leaves the hotel in the afternoon by herself, was gone all night and returns the next day with the little girl.  No, he remembers this kid. She told him he should use chlorine to irradiate the dinoflagellates in the swimming pool. Does that sound like someone we know?  What did the other lady look like? 
 Eve 8. They were working together.  Their own mini Jonestown. Eve 6 said they were prone to suicide.  Ah, maybe it would be better if we took responsibility for the girls.  Yeah. 
 Can you hold it?  Hi. Where's your bathrooms?  Thanks. 
 Oh, can I get four diet sodas?  Okay, two diet and two regular. To go. Please. 
 Those are the diet? 
 Are you sure? These are really sweet.  Okay. 
 Come on. 
 How much?  You want to pay?  Thanks. 
 You didn't pick up my keys off the counter, did you? 
 All right. I'll be right back. 
 SCULLY!  I just wanted to open the car door for you. 
 I only had a sip.  SCULLY! I GOT THEM!  SCULLY! 
 Back off. We're federal agents.  Forget your sodas?  That's the last thing you are. They can't hide behind the bureaucracy, Mrs. Reardon. You have every right to know what happened. You have a right to know about your daughter. SEPARATOR Well, that's one of the luxuries of hunting down aliens and genetic mutants. You rarely get to press charges. 
 What?  That's weird. I'm sure I locked it.  I told you I locked the door. 
 Ten-to-one, you can't dance to it. 
  It's an old friend. 
 For what?  I'll try to remember that.  No, actually. It's one of the few things you didn't drive a stake through. 
 Dana Scully, this is Phoebe Green, terror of Scotland Yard.  What brings you to the colonies? Your car bomber?  The Irish Republican Army?  You think he's that determined?  So what brings you on this detour to Washington, D.C., Inspector?  I'll run it by our arson specialist.  That's, uh, from Sherlock Holmes. It's a private joke.  Um... we knew each other in school in England. She was brilliant and, uh, I got in over my head and, uh, paid the price.  That was over ten years ago, Scully.  Oh, I was merely extending her a professional courtesy.  Look, I'm going to run this by the arson guys and then she's on her own.  How's that?  But there have been cases of pyrokinetics, people who can control and conduct fire.  I'm afraid so, Watson. But you're off the hook on this one. 
 I mean I'm not going to put you through this. 
 Phoebe's little mindgame.  There's something else I haven't told you about myself, Scully. I hate fire. Hate it. Scared to death of it.When I was a kid, my best friend's house burned down. Had to spend the night in the rubble to keep away looters. For years, I had nightmares about being trapped in a burning building.
 This is classic Phoebe Green. Mindgame player extraordinaire. Ten years it's taken me to forget about this woman, and she shows up in my life with a case like this.  Phoebe is fire.  Sooner or later, a man's got to face his demons. 
 I pulled this report off the wire last night. Eyewitnesses are saying that a customer in the bar caught fire but they're still looking for a body.  The bar's across the street from the fire station. It burned to the ground before they had a chance to even respond. The fire marshall said it burned so hot, it turned the concrete foundation into sponge cake. This was a woman who was in the bar. Hello? Miss Kotchek?  I'm Special Agent Mulder from the F.B.I. This is Inspector Green. 
 Long hair, short hair?  Do you think you could work with a composite artist and come up with a sketch for us?  Can I get your full name and address?  That's no problem. You can come down to the field office and work with somebody there. I'll give you a minute to think about it, okay? 
 It's a technique I refined in my relationship with you. 
 I'm sorry, that was a cheap shot. I don't want to dredge up the past. Let's just stick to the case.  Look, Phoebe, I...  I'm cursed with a photographic memory.  Like I said, just stick to the case.  I would agree with you but they haven't found a body yet. So can we count on you? Remember those reports I told you about, about people who could control and conduct fire, pyrokinetic?  I think this guy just sent us a message that he's far more exotic.  I'm just not used to someone so quick to agree with me.  What kind of protection does the family have?  Well, he should look into getting a few additional men and limit public exposure. 
 Unless you wanted to set a trap. GREEN: I had thought of that. But we must be careful and discreet. The party's at 8:00 at the Venerable Plaza. I'll be traveling with the family so why don't you go on ahead and have a look around?Oh, and I've taken a room at the hotel for the night.
 Thanks. All right, thank you.
 Mulder. 
 I'm in Boston.  What have you got?  Yeah, yeah... 
 No, it's just that I'm, I'm kind of anticipating having my hands full. 
 His name is Cecil L'Ively.  Your arsonist. Where's the rest of the family?  Well, go find them. We've got to get them packed and get them out of here. 
 I know. He disappeared.  Nothing, um... I found this out in the garage. It's been very hard on the family.
 Michael? Jimmie? It looks like we found the missing driver.
 Everybody out!  I think he rigged the whole house.  It's fuel. 
 Scully, see if you can find a fire extinguisher. Everybody else, outside. 
 I'll take care of the children. Go! 
 Oh yeah. I'll be fine. There's no place I'd rather be. 
 Michael? Jimmie?  Don't move! 
 You have no idea.  I don't know.  No. She did messenger this to me last night though. 
 No. 
 Ten-to-one, you can't dance to it. 
SEPARATOR We? You mean the souls of your victims?  And you're the conduit? 
 From here? Where exactly are you? 
 That's exactly what the state of North Carolina intends to do next week. 
 First you've got to prove you're telling the truth. Don't get me wrong, Luther. I want to believe.
 I tore this off my New York Knicks t-shirt. It has nothing to do with the crime. 
 Scully, what's wrong? Did Boggs say something to you?  It's alright. Why don't you go back to the motel? We've exposed Boggs as a fraud. Boggs is not what he claims to be. He may be orchestrating the kidnapping. Now he knows that we're on to him, he doesn't have a chance with this charade. I'm going to wait around a couple of hours and try to interrogate him. Hopefully, he'll tell me where the kids are. 
 It's Mulder. I just heard that Liz Hawley's family made a positive ID on the charm you found at the warehouse. The police are searching that place inch-by-inch but they haven't been able to find anything yet. I expected to find you at the crime scene.
 No, no, just five hours of Boggs' channeling. After three hours, I asked him to summon up the soul of Jimi Hendrix and requested "All Along the Watchtower." You know the guy's been dead for twenty years and he still hasn't lost his edge.  Then how did you find it?  Scully, I told you about Boggs...  That doesn't matter! That's exactly what Boggs wanted! He could have been setting you up! You could be dead right now! Why did you lie in your police report?  What you're really saying is that you didn't want to go on record admitting that you believed in Boggs! The bureau would expect something like that from "Spooky" Mulder, but not Dana Scully.  Why now? After all we've seen, why Boggs? Does this have to do with your father?You said that he didn't approve of you becoming an FBI agent. Now, if being on the job now makes you feel guilty or uncomfortable or uneasy, I think you should back away because if it's clouding your judgement, you're putting yourself in danger. You love your father. Dana... open yourself up to extreme possibilities only when they're the truth. That goes for Luther Boggs... and your father. As for Luther Boggs, he's the greatest of lies.I know he's working with someone on the outside and they planted that evidence. Now, we have to be very careful about planning our next move because he's five steps ahead. The one advantage we have is time.
 Scully, look at this. 
 That's exactly what I want Boggs to think. 
 They haven't been found, the article is bogus. The Carolinian made this one up just for us, only six people know about it. Later on today, Boggs gets his weekly phone priviliges. Hopefully, he'll call his accomplice to find out what happened. Phone privilige is in two hours.
 Turn off that phone. Turn it off. 
 Mulder. 
 Agent Scully believes what we all believe. That you have the kids. Now where are they? 
 Liz Hawley and Jim Summers will be dead.  What's the name?  Describe him.  Where is he?  Did you get that? 
 Federal agent! 
 No matter what, don't believe him. Boggs created this whole charade to get back at me for putting him on death row. You'd be the next best thing.  Don't... deal with him. He could be trying to claim you as his last victim. Scully. 
 Dana. After all you've seen, after all the evidence, why can't you believe? 
 You couldn't face that fear? Even if it meant never knowing what your father wanted to tell you?  How? SEPARATOR Thanks for the call. Five deaths. Four in the last six weeks between here and Boston. In each case, the victim dies in the throes of passion. Two women and three men, including the last one.  All with symptoms of massive coronary arrest.  The oldest drug, not even illegal. Each body showed the presence of huge amounts of pheromones.  Radar love. Only about a hundred times stronger than found anywhere in nature, strong enough to product anaphylactic shock or a coronary.  It's been done, but in nowhere near these concentrations and hold on to your hat, Scully, 'cause you're gonna love this. The pheromones we're talking about - they contain human DNA.  I don't know. But if it's true, then this guy is a walking aphrodysiac. He's the ultimate sex magnet.  I know. That is a puzzle.  It gets weirder. As I said, there's been four deaths matching this MO in the last six weeks - in Boston, Hartford, Philadelphia and here in Washington. 
 There was a death I made a note of about a year ago with the same symptoms. A 32 year-old UMW labor organizer was found dead outside a town called Steveston in the woods of Massachusetts, home to a sect of religious isolationists called 'The Kindred'. 
 The Kindred are known for their handmade stoneware pottery. They mine the clay themselves in the local hills.  The white clay in those hills is particular to that region. It's also the same substance I scraped out of the scratches on the latest victim's sides.  Yes, but it looks as if one of them may have forgotten to clean under his fingernails. Excuse me, ma'am, this is federal Agent Scully, I'm Agent Mulder.  What can you tell me about the Kindred? They keep pretty much to themselves, huh?  What about the missing ones?  Can I take a look at them?  How would I get up to see them?  Excuse me. Ladies?   I think I'm gonna go inside.  You need anything from the feed store? 
 Scully, what are you doing?  You all right?  You want to sit down? 
 Interesting way of life. You get any sense about them?  Oh, I've been saying that for years. Oh, for a 4-wheel drive. Looks like about a mile walk.  Now ... this ... that's west.   That we should be there already. 
 I'm Agent Mulder, this is Agent Scully. We're here to investigate a murder.  We can't do that.  I was wondering if we might ask a few questions. We're looking for someone we believe may have come from here.  If we can arrange for you to look at the video tape, maybe you can identify the individual.  Five murders, so far.  Has anyone left here recently?  That's all right. We didn't take any offense.  Thanks for your cooperation. 
 The Addams family finds religion.  You believe all that back there, Scully?  All that "we take care of our own" business?  I think it was all an elaborate act.  No, all this simple life, living from abundance crap. These people know something, Scully. You can see it in their eyes - the way they look at one another.  Did you notice how they managed not to answer a single question of ours? And that outburst at the table was right on cue. Somehow, they got us to answer their questions. Did you ask yourself why there weren't any children around?  You want to know what was really odd? You know those pictures we saw down in the store in Steveston today, the ones from the thirties? I swear I saw some of those same faces at the dinner table tonight.  Maybe. Maybe not everything is as black and white as it appears to be. 
 I'm going to go back for a little look-see. 
 Maybe they went to the movies. Do you hear that?  I think I want to see what's in that cellar. 
  Scully ... 
  Scully? 
 Get off of her! 
 What the hell were you doing back there?  You don't know?  You all right? 
 How you feeling?  Why? You don't remember any of it.  Why didn't you get out of there before he ...  How did you know he wasn't the killer?  Just Brother what's-his-name buried in some gopher hole in the wall. Buried alive.  Because I was in there with him. And his face was ... was different. Even his hair, it was almost feminine. It was like he was going through some kind of a transformation.  That would explain the hotel security video.  I know what I saw, Scully. And I saw you about to do the wild thing with some stranger. 
 Maybe it's the sex that kills.  I don't know. 
 What do you remember?  Try to remember, Michael. The policeman at the scene supports what you said, but maybe there was something ... unusual about this woman. Something you wouldn't feel comfortable telling the police on the record.  Absolutely.  Scout's honor. 
 I think Don Juan in there knows the difference between the male and the female of the species.  No earthly means of transportation. 
SEPARATOR Still missing. He hasn't been home or checked in with the office. I heard something on the way down about a mutilation?  You said he was chasing this guy for almost a year?  What are you thinking?  That still doesn't explain why he would just vanish. Dupre's partner-- who was she?  Lula Phillips.  He was a prison guard.  It says here she was released on May 2, 1993.  Lovely couple.  Thats a lot of money now that she doesnt have to split it two ways.  They were married.  I dont think this was a simple necrophiliac mutilation. Willis sliced and diced those fingers to get at the wedding ring. 
 You can see by these two bifurcations here that whoever held that cleaver was using his left hand.  Willis is right-handed. I checked his pistol grip at the armory. But all the bank surveillance tapes show that Dupre is left-handed.  How long did Willis flatline before you revived him?  This is the EKG strip that recorded his cardiac activity at the time. Now, *in your medical opinion,* what does that look like?   But what does it *look* like?  Now, you say Dupre and Willis went into cardiac arrest at the exact same time, right?  Which means for minutes, both men were technically dead.  You resuscitated his body.  Two men died in that crash room, Scully. One man came back. The question is which one? Dr. Varnes believes this burst of energy is responsible for the transformational nature of the experience.  What about the negative consequences?  Thats a nice story.  I sense a big "but" coming.  For instance?  How well do you know him?  The plot thickens.  Do you believe hes predisposed to this type of psychotic episode?  Was the television turned on when they found him?  I dont think Tommy was much a reader since he doesnt seem to have owned any books and from the position of the body, Id say maybe he was watching the tube when he was shot.   Looks like you were right.  Jack, good to see you back among the living. 
 Thats fancy shooting.   Well, by the looks of it, I wouldnt worry about recertification.  Yeah. Its, uh, Scullys birthday and I was wondering if youd sign that for her. 
  Happy Birthday, Scully.  Its from Willis. I thought you two had the same birthday.  Well, thats news to him. I asked him to sign it. And he signed it with his left hand.   Yeah. After I found out that the evidence from the Phillips murder is missing.  The print we lifted. Our best lead is gone. Someone stole it before the lab had a chance to take a look at it.  Im not sure Willis is Willis.  Can you at least accept the possibility that during his near-death experience some kind of psychic transference occurred?  Did you forget how to sign your name? This is a copy of the automobile requisition form Willis filed the day before he was shot. Compare the signatures. 
 Because it wasnt Willis who answered the hot line.   Forget it, Bruskin.   I said forget it, Bruskin. 
 It doesnt matter what I think. Were still after the same thing.  Mulder.   Yeah.   Willis?   Wheres Scully?   Let me talk to her.   Dana, are you okay?   Dana?  Katensville PD just reported a drugstore was broken into right here on the corner of Old Forge Road and Madison and Im betting that Scully is somewhere within this five mile radius.  200 units of NPH insulin were taken with a box of syringes. Willis is diabetic.   Mulder.   Wheres Willis?   Let me talk to Scully.   We dont deal unless we know Scully is alive.   You listen to me --- you lay one hand on Scully, and so help me, God ----   Forget it. Its Scullys cellular number. Theyre using her phone. We cant trace them. 
 Yeah, but can you squelch the voice even more this time?  There. That engine sound.  Is that a small plane?   Great! 
 Okay, from our last phone contact weve identified what sounds like light aircraft taking off. Now, Washington County Regional Airport happens to fall within our area, just south of the state line. Since takeoffs are north to south its a fair bet that our target area lies along this flight path. For those of you who remember ninth-grade math that gives us an area of just over three square miles to cover --- roughly 1000 households. With 100 law enforcement officials at our disposal at about 30 households per man per hour we should be able to canvass the entire area in about three hours. Agent Bruskin will grid the target area and divide it among the teams. 
 And for those of you ---who dont know already  this ones important to me. So, uh, lets do it right. Thanks. 
  Ditto. Hold your positions. Keep radios at two. 
 How do we look?  We will soon enough. 
 FB ---- 
  Scully, are you okay?  Hi. I got this from the morgue along with the rest of his personal effects. I thought you might want it. 
  Next of kin?   The official story.  Fugitive Lula Phillips died yesterday in a shoot-out with federal agents which also resulted in the death of Special Agent Jack Willis killed in the line of duty.   Good night. SCULLY:  Its not working. It stopped. At 6:47.  The exact time that Jack went into cardiac arrest at the hospital.  It means It means whatever you want it to mean.  Good night. 
SEPARATOR Robbing a jewelry store is a federal crime.  I don't know. I got a call from some guy I used to work with over at the violent crimes section, said it was important. 
 Reggie! Reggie! 
 This is Special Agent Scully. Reggie Purdue. 
 You guys turn up anything?  Why?  Wait, wait a second...  What about witness descriptions?  Damn it, Reggie, that's Barnett.  It was my first case at the bureau. Barnett was doing armed jobs all over D.C. and getting away with it, very trigger-happy. Killed seven people. There was this big task force, Reggie was my ASAC. I was twenty-eight years old, right out of the academy. I had this theory on the case. Reggie thought I was full of it. I was full of it.  That Barnett had an inside connection. An employee at the armored car company was tipping him off about large shipments of cash. Turns out I was sort of right.  Yeah, we planted bogus waybills, manifests with the armored car company to try to set a trap but Barnett was way ahead of us. That's... when the notes started. 
 Clever, huh?  No, we did. We did, but not, uh, not clean. An agent died because I screwed up. 
 He avoided the death penalty on a technicality. But he went down for every job he did. Consecutive terms, three-hundred-and-forty years. The judge promised me he would die in prison.  No, that's just it. He did die in prison, four years ago.  I was paying attention. 
 Yeah, I play golf with him every Sunday. What do you think?  You're slipping, Henderson.  Yeah... seriously, what do you think?  Yeah, does it match Barnett?  But you're not sure? 
 Could it have been traced over an old note of Barnett's?  Thanks, Henderson, I owe you one.  Ninety-five percent sure it's Barnett's handwriting. 
 Federal Bureau of Prisons sent me a copy of his death certificate. "Name of deceased, Barnett, John Irvin. Cause of death, cardiac arrest. Date, September sixteenth, 1989." 
 The note was written in the last forty-eight hours.  No prints.  Revenge from the grave? That'd be a neat trick.  And he showed you the videotape? 
 Did I? Steve Wallenberg had a wife and two kids. One of his boys is an all-star on his football team now. If I had pulled the trigger two seconds earlier and Wallenberg would be here to see his kid play. Instead, I got some dead man robbing jewelry stores and sending me haikus. 
 I'll get you, you son of a bitch! 
 Barnett said he'd get me, you were there.  Apparently not.  It's Barnett, Reggie.  I don't know, I just feel it. 
 And now?  I've heard this story. 
 What? Are you saying that somebody from the bureau's behind this?  Killing a sales clerk just to leave me a note? I'd say that's going a little out of your way. 
 You knew John Barnett?  How well did you know him? 
 Are you aware that Barnett died of cardiac arrest in this facility in 1989?  Why do you say that?  Was it Doctor Ridley?  I know what I'm not going to do. I'm not going to hang around and wait for Barnett to send me another valentine.  I didn't know you believe in ghosts, Scully. 
 Mulder. 
 Barnett? 
 Well, you know, shouldn't I be?  In some states. What makes you think I'm taping you?  What state are you in? 
 I don't think so. 
 How do I know it's really you, Barnett? 
 I don't know, what did you tell me in the courtroom? 
 Listen, by all accounts, John Barnett is a dead man. 
 Fine. I just need confirmation that you are who you say you are. 
 Barnett? You there? 
 Yeah, he was hip to the trace.  John Barnett was from New Hampshire. He had a slight accent. Listen to this. 
 I don't know, but that is... John Barnett. I'm sure of it. Would you be able to tell if this note was written by somebody using a prosthetic hand? 
 So you think it's the same person that wrote the first note.  Yeah. 
 What do you mean?  Where does it say that?  What kind of research?  She looks about ninety.  What's the cause of death?  Is that Doctor Ridley?  Why wasn't he allowed to?  What?  Ridley's found a way.  He wanted human research subjects, right? Prisoners. Prisoners like John Barnett.  Well, what would you have said twenty years ago about gene splicing, DNA fingerprinting, cloning, artificial intelligence? Maybe we're not looking for a man in his late forty's after all. Maybe John Barnett has found the perfect disguise... youth.
 If you're really Doctor Joseph Ridley, where've you been for the past five years?  What about Barnett?  What about you?  And what about Barnett?  Barnett's not dying.  You were able to grow John Barnett a new hand?  Until John Barnett.  They financed your research?  I wish Agent Perdue were around to appreciate the irony.  Yes, Ridley was...  What does he want?  Will he get it? 
 You're aware that this... freak of science you're negotiating with is a murderer? 
 I will. 
 What's that?  What do you mean?  Scully... 
 Mulder. Barnett?
 The rest of my friends? 
 You're not that smart. 
 Well, you won't get that chance. 
 What does Barnett know about your phone messages?  Where's that? Before the performance and during, we're working at a disadvantage because we don't know exactly what Barnett looks like. Study each of these faces. Know them, particularly the eyes.  We know that if he shows, he'll be keying on Scully. So wherever she is, she should not leave your sight. We've got two hours before the performance. Know this place inside and out. We don't want any shots fired if we can help it. We want to take Barnett alive, okay? How are you feeling? Let's make sure it's not the last time. 
 Down! Check her out!
 Back off, back off... 
 Just let her go.  Shut up!  Call an ambulance!  How you feeling?  That bullet went through eight layers of kevlar, you're lucky to be alive.  Well, they flew in three specialists to try to save his life. That guy in the ugly suit there is probably C.I.A. Been trying to talk to him.  Yeah, but he's not talking. 
 Tells you a lot about the book, doesn't it? 
 Bastard will take that research with him to the grave.  Who knows? If Barnett didn't destroy it, he could have stashed it anywhere. Which would have a cruel irony, wouldn't it? Scientific knowledge that could change the course of mankind buried out in a field somewhere or in some safe deposit box. Getting old, just like the rest of us.  And when they do... maybe he can get his revenge from beyond the grave but somehow, I feel like we haven't heard the last from John Barnett. 
SEPARATOR Conceivably.  Possibly. 
 Its feasible. 
 Swamp gas?  Happens to me when I eat Dodger Dogs. How can a dozen witnesses including a squad of police vehicles in three counties become hysterical over swamp gas? 
 The only question for me is, why was the truck driver singled out?  Yeah, it can play tricks on you. But not like this. I started these stopwatches at the same time.
 Mr. Ranheim, Id appreciate it if you could elaborate on the report you filed last night regarding your encounter. 
 Last night, you said it was cigar-shaped and black.  Ok. So, how long have you not been yourself? 
 Id like to examine the truck.  This man has had an alleged close encounter. The truck undoubtedly contains important trace evidence. Sir! If I may Not not here. 
 Its obvious someone got to the police chief. Ranheim was hiding something.  He only became sick last night. 
 UFOs are frequently witnessed by soldiers during wartime. 
 What if thats what made the soldiers in Iraq sick? The exhaust or fuel from a classified aircraft or its weapon. 
 Theyd deny it, but it could possibly explain how Ranheim developed his symptoms.  I want to talk to some people when we get back to Washington.  No, these guys are like an extreme government watchdog group. They publish a magazine called The Lone Gunman. Some of their information is first-rate; covert actions, classified weapons. Some of their ideas are downright spooky. Is that so?  Barney? 
 Settle down, Frohike. 
 Hey, Byers, it is a federal crime to deface money. 
 O o ok, alright. What do you know about the Gulf War Syndrome?  Have you heard of any classified planes being flown during the Persian Gulf War?  What about UFO activity during that period? 
 I think its remotely plausible that someone might think youre hot. 
 Whats the matter? 
 Hello? 
 Yeah. What are we doing here? 
 Thats too bad. Something tells me you have the connections to get great seats.  Its just a tourist.  What am I onto? We go down to investigate a truck drivers encounter with a UFO and the next thing, were discovering electronic surveillance equipment. Whos listening to us? Why wont you tell me?What am I onto?
 You risked exposure coming here. 
 Is that where the Iraqi wreckage is being held? Are UFOs monitoring the area?  Wait, wait. I, I just wanted to take this opportunity to thank you. Youve helped my work so much and never asked for anything in return. I know youve put yourself at great risk to do so.
 This is the best photographic evidence I have ever seen. When I first saw the Gulf Breeze photos, I knew they were a hoax but this this is the quality of evidence the government has amassed for decades at the highest classified levels. That business with the truck was just a decoy to keep anyone from looking closely away from Fort Benning where they are keeping the remains of the Iraqi UFO. We have to leave for Georgia immediately, Scully  What?  There can be an off-camera light source creating that shadow.  Theres probably a degree of tint in the windshield or the gradation could be attributed to atmospheric conditions.  Why dont you just admit it, Scully? Youre determined not to believe him.  I am determined to follow a lead that may result in proof of the existence of extraterrestrial biological entities. I need to go. 
 No.  Thank you. 
 I had the photo analyzed by the bureaus computers. Initially, it appears to be legitimate. The film grain matches, the pattern and density, color levels, shading then I noticed this. Its the moon, half full. I had the reflection in this window enlarged to 25. Theres the moon again, a quarter full. Not to mention the fact that the window couldnt even catch the moons reflection from that angle. You were right, Scully. Its a fake. He tried to decieve us. Now were alone on this. Theres no one we can trust. They went to a lot of trouble to put us on the wrong track. Theres something here that no ones supposed to find. The photograph was a fake. At least youre not insulting me further by feigning appaled surprise. I thought you were my ally.  Yeah, imagine if Eisenhower told the rest of the Allies that D-Day would take place in Belgium.  Then why did you lie to me?  Who are you to decide that for me?  Dangerous. You mean in a sense of outrage like the reaction to the Kennedy assassinations or M.I.A.s or radiation experiments on terminal patients, Watergate, Iran-Contra, Roswell, the Tuskegee experiments, where will it end? Oh, I guess it wont end as long as men like you decide what is truth. That transcript you gave me of the Iraqi pilot, that was the truth, wasnt it?  Whyd you even bother to show it to me?  Hey, Scully, glad you could drop by.  I been thinking about this whole situation, yknow? And I think youre right. I think we won this one, I think we should just move on. 
 Called every weigh station and bureau office west of Colorado. Tied up an airphone for three hours. I dont speak Japanese, but I think some businessman told me to stick a piece of sushi where the sun dont shine.  At least we can be sure they didnt trace our call. I couldnt find the truck. Did you have any luck?   Leverling and Priest Rapids? East bank of the Columbia River? Did you send a field investigator? And you can substantiate the sighting? Ok, Nick, thanks a lot. Ive contacted several organizations that have hotlines for UFO reports. Center of UFO Studies in Chicago, MUFON, NICAP none of them have ever reported a week of such activity. It began in Tennessee where Ranheim was encountered.
 And after last nights hoax look at this. Seven sightings in Mattawa, Washington. Thats 100 miles away. Looks like they want their colleague back. Whats over there? 
 Hello.  Youve seen UFOs?  This is it. Theres Ranheim.  Just the kind of challenge theyre looking for.  Its Mulder. Turn the tape recorder off. 
 Turn it off!  How would you like to have, on your front page, the first substantiated photo of an extraterrestrial biological entity?  Just hack me some identification numbers. Braidwood and Stefoff. (A man tears off a pass and comes out of the booth.) 7-5-9-3.  Thanks. (The gate opens and Mulder starts the car. As they start to go through, the man comes out of the booth again.) Langly said he couldnt get into Level 6, so thats where we SEPARATOR Where'd you get this?  Reverend Calvin Hartley.  The boy's his adopted son, Samuel. He claims to have found him as an infant lying in the tall weeds on the banks of the muddy Mississippi.  It's more than a claim. The man he saved appears as a regular attraction in the Reverend's tent ministry. The boy's been performing miracles every week for the past ten years. Twice on Sundays.  For what? Fraud?  What was the cause of death?  When do we leave for Tennessee? I think I saw some of these same people at Woodstock.  I saw the movie. 

 No, wait, wait, this is the part where they bring out Elvis.  Well, where is he?  Yeah.  Oh, yeah. This is Special Agent Dana Scully. 
 Something tells me you're not a member of the Reverend Hartley's flock.  People want to believe, you know.  Well, even if Hartley and Samuel are fakes, it's still a long way from accusing the boy of murder.  You think that's how he killed them? With a touch?  Sheriff.  Looks like you may have a few believers on the payroll. 
 Let's go. Hey, Sheriff? What evidence do you have to charge the boy with murder?  Look at him, though. He's drunk.  Let me have a minute with him?  Samuel, I'm Agent Mulder. This is Agent Scully - from the FBI.  Looks like you took quite a beating there.  Guilty of murder?  How'd you do it, Samuel?  Really? What pain is that?   I want to hear more about this pain. Tell me.  What else do you see?  Hey, I need another minute with him.  I don't know. "And when it was morning, the east wind brought the locusts. And the locusts covered the face of the whole earth, so that the land was darkened and they did eat every herb of the ...   ... land, and all the fruit of the trees which the hail had left."  Yeah, maybe in a cornfield, but this happened in a courtroom.  I had these patient cases sent over from Kenwood County Hospital. These are physician-documented cases of patients who went to Samuel after conventional treatments failed.  I've encountered dozens of psychic healers in the X-Files, but none like this. I think the kid's for real.  Well, western medicine treats the human body in biochemical terms, right?  But the body can also be treated as an electromagnetic system.  Why not?  Well, you heard him, Scully. He muddied the river of his own faith. That means he's ... 
 Why did you want to speak with us?  Samuel's being tried for murder. I think what you need is a good lawyer.  Well, how can you be sure of that?  Somehow, I don't think that argument will work on a jury. And Samuel's confession won't help much, either.  Excuse me. 
  Hey, where'd she go?  A little girl.  It's a girl.  A little girl. 
 Do you think the boy really did it?  Why not?   You must have really liked 'The Exorcist'?  I thought I saw someone I knew.  Why do you say that?  I've seen her twice now.  Oh ... I'm not delusional, Scully.  You think this is what Margaret Hohman and her parents were imagining? 
 Samuel? It's Agent Mulder.  I want to talk with you. If you'd prefer your attorney were present ...  I put a call in to Sheriff Daniels. He's on his way down here. I'm gonna ask him to release you. 
 Did you poison Margaret Hohman?  Did you poison her using potassium or sodium cyanide, because that's what killed her.  You're innocent, Samuel - unless you had a hand in administering it, and I don't think you did.  Well, the evidence will be presented at your arraignment tomorrow. The habeas corpus law will force them to release you, so you might as well go home and get some rest anyway.  Look, Samuel, if you think that the punishment for your sins is the deaths of those people ...  I can't stand here and argue with your Biblical rhetoric, but I do know that the law will find you innocent! 
 You said you could see my pain. Look at me.  What do you see now?  I don't believe you. I've seen her. It was her, wasn't it?  You made her appear to me, didn't you? Look at me.   Is she alive? Is that what I'm supposed to believe, or is this a trick?   Jailer! 
 I called you down here to ask you to release the boy.  His innocence.  I don't want to pick a fight. He seems determined to stay here anyway.  It tells me that you're determined to have him charged, while your real homicide suspect is still at large.  
 What look is that?  Clues.  Let's find out. 
 Scully.  It's potato.  Someone left a trail of food in the ventilation system, leading to the courtroom. You dump your locusts in here ... instant plague.  Biological supply houses usually hatch them on order to farms and universities. It shouldn't be too hard to find out who set this up.  I'll call an ambulance.  Who?   Mulder. 
  Scully.  Sheriff Daniels just called. Samuel's body is missing from the morgue. Any witnesses?  She saw somebody take the body?  What do you mean, not actually?   You coming, Sheriff? 
 And you're sure it was him?  I have a strong sense the Reverend Hartley's not going to be able to give up the pulpit.  It might even strengthen his faith. Remember, the boy did rise from the dead. That kind of thing happens only once or twice every two thousand years or so.  Somehow, I don't think so.  I think people are looking hard for miracles ... so hard that maybe they make themselves see what they want to see. 
SEPARATOR Then who or what do you think was responsible?  Then are you saying that a person or persons was responsible for this?  Can we see the corral?  Yeah?  What kinds of things?  Nope. Not a thing. 

 Besides which, police and coroner's report make no mention of such an act.  The body's been transferred to the reservation authorities. We're supposed to get in touch with, uh, um, Sheriff Charlie Tskany. Excuse me, uh, we're not from around here. We're looking for Sheriff Tskany. 
 Anyone, uh, know Charlie Tskany?  How'd you know?  Well, they told me that even though my deodorant's made for a woman, it's strong enough for a man. 
 I want to believe.  I think you already know what we're looking for.   We're looking for anything that can create human tracks in one step and animal tracks in the next.  Who were they?  The woman in the pool hall said that people were afraid of some Indian legend. What do they believe happened in the Parker case?  Was the woman in the pool hall his sister?  Yeah.  We're gonna need to take a look at Joe Goodensnake's dental records. 
 See, these are the canine cuspids. They're normal.  No, you see the second incisor here is chipped just like the ones in his mouth. These match Joe Goodensnakes'.  Lyle Parker was attacked, he has scars just like Joe. Do you have a facility where we can perform an autopsy?  Well, if Joe's teeth are abnormal, an autopsy might reveal abnormalities in the interior of his anatomy as well.  It's a cremation. After that, we'll have nothing.  Charlie? Do you believe that the spirit of Joe Goodensnake is in that room?  A true piece of history, Scully.  The very first X-file, initiated by J. Edgar Hoover himself in 1946.  During World War II, a series of murders occurred in and around the northwest, seven here in Browning alone. Each victim was basically ripped to shreds and eaten, as if by a wild animal. However, many of the victims were found at home, as if they allowed their killer to enter. In 1946, police cornered what they believed to be such an animal in a cabin in Glacier National Park. They shot it, but when they went in to retrieve the carcass, they found only the body of Richard Watkins.  The murders stopped that year. Because the cases were unsolved and considered so bizarre, Hoover locked them away, hoping that in time people around here would forget about them.  In '59, '64, '78 and now again in '94. But ...   ... these animal-man related murders predate the oldest X-file by 150 years. Members of the Lewis and Clark expedition wrote of Indian men who could change their shape into that of a wolf. 
 How can you just dismiss the evidence - the tracks in the mud, the shredded skin, a man with the teeth of an animal?  Let's hope so. 
 I read the report of your investigation into the Goodensnake homicide. It was very good, thorough, professional. But what I want to know is off the record. What do you think really happened?  Charlie, do you believe in shape-shifting?  That's not from any animal I've ever seen. Sheriff, I think it's time we had a talk. An exchange of ideas? 
  What are you hiding?  Over? Is that why you wouldn't allow an autopsy on Joe Goodensnake's body? You thought it would all end when he was cremated? What were you afraid we'd find?  In 1946? The Watkins case?   Just as long as it's not "Spooky Fox". Tell me, Ish ... what did you see?  The healed scars on Joe Goodensnake's body.  Shortly after, the police killed him.  Eight years later. But with Watkins dead, how could there have been an attack by manitou?  Gwen! 
 Let her up.  Yeah, this is Agent Mulder from the FBI. I was told I could reach Agent Scully at this number.  So I can reach her there?  What's that?  Damn! It keeps disconnecting. The mountain must be blocking the signal. How much farther?   Scully? 

 Augh!  I heard it come up here. Come on.  It wasn't a mountain lion, Scully.  Where's Gwen? She said she'd come see us before we left.  Just pulled up and left? Why would she do that?   Thank you. 
 I hope not. 

SEPARATOR Take a good look, Scully.  Thirty loggers working a clear-cutting contract in Washington State. Rugged, manly men in the full bloom of their manhood.  Anything strange, unexplainable, unlikely... boyfriend?  You give up? Funny, thats apparently what the Federal Forest Service has done as well.  In a word, they vanished. Or so it would appear. This is Doug Spinney and Steven Teague. They call themselves "monkey wrenchers." The guys who drive spikes into trees, sabotage logging equipment and otherwise make life miserable for lumberjacks and lumbermills.
 Right. Two weeks ago, the group of loggers I just showed you radioed a message that Spinney and Teague had gone on a spree. Spiking trees, sabotaging equipment, causing general mischief. One week later, all radio communication was cut off.  No. The lumber company that employs the men has asked the Federal Forest Service to look into the matter. Two officials were sent in a week ago and no one has heard from them since.  Thats what the lumber company and the Federal Forest Service are accusing. Theyve asked the F.B.I. to investigate. I had to pull a few strings to make sure we got the case. 
 In 1934, long before anyone even knew what an ecoterrorist was, a W.P.A. crew vanished from that same area without a trace. Not one of those men was ever found or heard from again.  Not likely. Thats a lot of flannel to be choking down even for Bigfoot. Come on, Scully, itll be a nice trip to the forest.
 Hi. Fox Mulder, this is Dana Scully, were with the F.B.I.  Whats that in your windshield there? Is that a bullet hole?  Somebody took a shot at you?  Is that who you think took a shot at you?  Mulder, Scully.  So why do the ecoterrorists target you?  You got a spare, dont you?  Someone forgot to clean their plate.  Party favors. 
 Whats that?  Look at that.  Made by what?  You alright, Scully? 
 Barely.  Itsy-bitsy spider. 
 What are you doing?  Lets just hear what he has to say. 
 Hey, its alright. Why did you say that darkness was our enemy? Happen to who? 
 What happened here?  Why not just hike out?  What are you guys doing out here?  Just, just hold off a second, okay?  I think Im going to suggest that we sleep with the lights on. 
 This tree must be hundreds of years old.  Hey, look at this. What would this represent? I dont think he did it.  Well, hes not going anywhere!  Maybe the wood in this ring is different. Theyre feeding on it.  Could they have been living in that tree for hundreds of years?  What do you know about insects, Scully?  And theyve been around a long time, right?  And this tree is what, 5, 6, 700 years old?  And these rings represent a history of climatic changes, which means that in this year or season in the life of the tree, there was some kind of strange event that produced an abnormal ring.  A volcanic eruption. This whole chain of mountains running from Washington to Oregon is still extremely active. Remember Mt. St. Helens?  When Mt. St. Helens erupted, there was a large amount of radiation that was released from inside the earth. Strange things started to grow. Theres actually this lake where theyve discovered a kind of amoeba that can literally suck a mans brains out.  Well, then maybe what were dealing with isnt a mutation at all. What if its some kind of... extinct insect larvae in that ring, deposited during a period of volcanic activity, brought up through the trees root system. Ancient insect eggs. Thousands, maybe millions of years old lying dormant until...  Yeah, maybe. Going somewhere? Doing a little auto repair. Looks to me like youre planning on cutting out of here.  So why are you sneaking around?  Hes got no reason to. Neither do I.  Radio is back up. 
 Im not getting any reception so the reciever could be trashed.  We could try. This is a call for help, is there anyone at this frequency?This is Special Agent Mulder of the F.B.I., we have an emergency and a possible quarantine situation. Our position is...What happened to the generator? Well, turn it back on, I got the radio working.  Spinney took it.  He left earlier this morning. He took a battery and some gas. Hes gonna come back for us in the morning.  He gave me his word, yeah.  Well, what would you have done? At least now weve got one chance of getting out of here alive which is one more chance than we had before.  There is no more gas, the other tanks have all been ruptured or filled with sugar.  Look, its done. I shouldnt have let him go. Lets just move past it, okay?  I dont know. Well think of something.  We only found one cocoon. 
 Look, Scully, what would you have done?  Oh, will you cut the sanctimonious crap?  Youre right. And were wasting time arguing about it. 
 Button this place up. If were gonna spend the night in here, weve got to do everything we can to make sure the bugs stay out there. 
 Its alright, Scully, Scully... 
 Stop moving! Stop! 
 Stand still! Stand still!  Theyre not just on you. Theyre everywhere. I think thats what that greasy residue is over everything.  We are. I think the light keeps them from swarming. Well be safe as long as we stay in the light. How are you doing? We got an hour and a half till sunrise.  Maybe somebody heard our radio transmission. Help could be on the way.  Well, Im not going to give up on Spinney. He gave me his word hed come back to get us.  Well think of something. You got a patch kit or an extra tube in your truck? Maybe we can patch this or at least get it to hold some air. With the spare in your truck, maybe we can limp down the mountain. If not, at least we can get on the radio and warn them whats out there. 
 Yeah. 
 No, its a jeep! 
 What happened to your friends?  Get out of there! Get back in the car! 
 Better. How did the tests come back? 
 Which is what?  Scully? How is she doing? I told her it was going to be a nice trip to the forest. How you going to contain it to the forest.What if the swarm migrates? And if theyre not? SEPARATOR I do.   I'm a special agent with the Federal Bureau of Investigation, I worked for three years at the F.B.I.'s behavioral science unit profiling serial killers.  Yes, I have.  These murders span nearly a century. Nineteen homicides, five occuring every thirty years since 1903, all in the Baltimore area. In each case, the liver was extracted and presumably eaten.  A trophy was taken, many of which were found in the living quarters of Eugene Tooms at 66 Exeter Street. Records show that a Eugene Tooms has resided at that same address since 1903, the same year a man was murdered in that building.  Besides the liver extraction, the most notable element connecting these cases is the undetermined point of entry. Many of the victims were found with their windows and doors locked from the inside.  These elongated fingerprints found at seven of the nineteen crime sites match Eugene Victor Tooms.   I contend that perhaps through genetic mutation, Eugene Tooms is capable of contorting and elongating his body in order to gain access to victims so that he may extract the livers which provide him with sustenance for the hibernation period of 30 years. He needs one more liver to complete this cycle.   A preliminary examination done at the time of Tooms' arrest revealed abnormalities in his striated muscles and axial bones. His attorney blocked further study...  I must ask that you place the safety of...  ...the people first and foremost...  This is a rare and unusual human creature...  ...who should not be released, but should be retained for further study.  If you release Eugene Tooms, he will kill again. It's in his genetic make-up.  You think they would have taken me more seriously if I wore the grey suit?   I don't care how it sounded as long as it was the truth.  And where were you? Your testimony was important.  What did he want?  I'm not taking my eyes off him.  He needs to kill, he'll do it the first chance he can but he won't kill the old couple. He won't be that obvious. Tooms didn't remain a secret for a hundred years by not being careful. Think of him as an animal. He'll only kill out of necessity or self-defense. If he makes an attempt, I'll be there to stop him.   No, I'll watch him. If he can't be tied to the most recent evidence, you'll have to go back to the earlier murders to prove it was him.  There's no statute of limitation on murder.  Look, Scully, if you're resistant because you don't believe, I'll respect that. But if you're resistant because of some bureaucratic pressure, they've not only reeled you in. They've already skinned you.   Excuse me.  Could you help me find my dog?  He's a Norweigan Elkhound. His name is Heinrich. I use him to hunt moose. 
 F.B.I.  I suspect an intruder in your house.  Its not enough. It doesnt tie it to Tooms.  Pine-scented.   Better?  Tooms hasnt come out of the house all day. I sat through a Phillies game, an Orioles game, and four hours of Ba-Ba-Booey. When it got dark, I took a walk around the block. Do you have that sandwich that I asked you to bring?   Ha-ha.   Article 30, paragraph 8.7?  A request for other agents to stake-out Tooms would be denied. Then we have no grounds.  Theyre out to put an end to the X-Files, Scully. I dont know why, but any excuse will do. Now, I dont really care about my record, but youd be in trouble just for sitting in this car and Id hate to see you to carry an official reprimand in your file because of me.   And I... I even made my parents call me Mulder. So... Mulder.  If theres an ice tea in that bag, could be love.   Here. Take my sandwich, I only had one bite. Youre gonna want it later, believe me. And youll call me if anything happens, immediately. Ill be here.   Yeah.  Whats going on?  Whats this about?  A good forensic scientist would know that there is not only a shoe print but also an impact point from inside the shoe. An indepth analysis of Tooms injury would show that my foot was not inside the shoe at the time of impact.  Of course.  Thats a good idea. Thanks for your concern.   Tooms will never voluntarily submit to a dental cast.   That makes five.  Hes building his nest. Thirty year hibernation.  Where hes gone for the last ninty years, 66 Exeter Street.  Whats there now? Its amazing how things change, isnt it?   No, a change for us. Its coming.  A hunch. 
SEPARATOR How'd you hear about us?  So you didn't get a description of who the kid saw?  Plus jumpers tend to open the window before they jump. Where's the kid now?  Like that?  Was his hair dark like mine or lighter like yours?  Michelle? Was his mustache like that?  
 Mrs. Bishop?   This is the man Michelle says she saw at the police station. Do you recognize him?  She also mentioned a friend ... someone named Sheila. Do you know who that is?  Look at that? Looks like a hawk or a falcon.  Japanese paper folding. Where'd she learn how to do that?  So Harry, you'll put that face into the system?  Can you give Scully a ride back into the city?  That's your department. I'm gonna go over to Brylin Hospital, see if I can have a little chat with Michelle's shrink. 
 Oh, oh, and check for burns or lesions on Barbala's body.  Psychokinesis is usually associated with an electrical charge.  How else could a 60-pound kid throw a 200-pound detective out the window? Could Michelle have fabricated him?  As in schizophrenia?  And in Michelle's case?  Any theories?  Have you tried deep regression hypnosis?  OK. Well, in the meantime, how have you been treating Michelle?  I'm sure. Have you observed any unexplained phenomena in Michelle's presence?  Inordinate physical strength, psychic ability, telekinesis...  Hey, you're the one that found a lesion on Barbala's body. You said it could have been caused by an intense concentration of electrothermal energy.  Why is it still so hard for you to believe, even when all the evidence suggests extraordinary phenomena?  What?  You have the police report describing Morris' death?  Does it describe how he was murdered?  Give me the grisly details.  This is what Michelle did to a dozen dolls in her shrink's office. Hell of a coincidence, wouldn't you say? Now before we discount anything, I think we should find out more about Charlie Morris. I got the address of his partner on the force. Hopefully, he can tell us something. Detective Fiore? We're with the FBI. Can we talk to you for a minute? Do you know this man? 
 You two were partners?  What can you tell us about the circumstances surrounding his death? 
 Well, we believe that the death of Detective Rudy Barbala yesterday can be linked to the death of Officer Morris nine years ago.  Well, that's what we need your help with. The police report said that Officer Morris was killed off-duty.  For what?  The Triads.  So you think that Charlie Morris was killed as a warning to back off?  Is it me or did we just get the brush-off?  What?  A patrol unit picked her up a few blocks away from the bus stop.  Mrs. Bishop, no one is accusing Michelle of anything.  I'm sorry, excuse me. 
 Three of whom are now dead. 
 And a little girl from Orchard Park. 
 Morris, Fiore, Barbala and Felder. What's wrong with this picture?  Right. Why would he say that?  What?  Is there a log sheet?  May we come in? 
 Scully. Look familiar? 
 Someone you might have had dinner with once, a friend of Tony's from work? A name you can't remember, anything?  Mrs. Fiore, I couldn't help noticing your origami collection. Did you do all these yourself?  Charlie?  Michelle is eight years old, that means that she was conceived at roughly the same time that Officer Morris was killed.  Metempsychosis, transmigration, reimbodiment, call it what you will.  Well, what about the composite drawing and the dolls and the fact that Michelle was witness to two deaths that can be tied to Charlie Morris?  It's not so far-fetched, Scully. Reincarnation is a basic tenet of many major religions.  Well, individuals with strong past-life memories often exhibit enhanced psychic abilities - ESP, telekinesis.  One short step away from proving the pre-existence of the human soul. 
 Dr. Spitz has conducted hundreds of these sessions and ...  Is it any more dangerous than pumping her full of thorazine?  We almost had it, Scully. We were right there.  We'll have to try it again.  Well, we have to change her mind.  The truth. What really happened to Charlie Morris nine years ago.  If we find Fiore. And if he's still alive. Scully, you saw what happened in there.  All evidence suggests that Michelle Bishop IS Charlie Morris.  Short of her growing a moustache, how much more apparent does it have to become for you to accept it?   The inconclusive results of Michelle's past life regression do not shake my basic belief in hypnosis as a tool for psychological healing. Whether or not it offers us definitive proof of previous lifetimes is another matter. However, in this particular case, all other explanations seem to be even more wanting. 
 There was a documented case in the early seventies of a man from Porlock, Ohio, who could influence undeveloped film. He could create shapes on the negative from his mind.  So you're saying he was drowned first and then mutilated to make it look like a signature execution?  Except for what?  You said salt water, right?  So Charlie Morris was drowned in his own tropical fish tank, and that's the last thing he saw before he died. We better hope Michelle Bishop is at home, tucked in bed. 
  Go check out upstairs.   Michelle! This won't make right what happened.   Closing entry, file number X-40271. Detective Anthony Fiore pleaded guilty yesterday in federal court to charges of first-degree murder after the fact, grand larceny and obstruction of justice. The deaths of Detective Rudy Barbala and former police officer Leon Felder are being ruled as accidental, although their complicity in the murder of Officer Charlie Morris has been definitively established. No charges were brought against Michelle Bishop, who today took her first swimming lesson. She claims no memory of the preceding events and both her mother and Dr. Braun have denied my request for a second past-life regression. End of field journal, April 19, 1994. Agents of record: Fox Mulder and Dana Scully. Status: Unexplained.SEPARATOR How was the wedding?  Did you catch the bouquet?   The project that everyone says doesn't exist, does exist.  The next generation in jet engine design, capable of doubling current supersonic speeds using half the fuel. At least in theory.  Yes.  I'm not sure, but Surnow is the second scientist on the team to die in the last six months.  There's something unexplainable here, Scully, but it's certainly not unidentifiable. 
  Keats?  Dr. Keats? We're with the FBI. I'm Agent Mulder, this is Agent Scully.  We understand you discovered Dr. Surnow this morning.   Who wrote this? 
 You see, the handwriting here doesn't seem to match any of the other handwriting on the board.   What about Roland Fuller?  Well, according to the police report, he was the only other person here last night.  Hi, Roland. Do you mind if we sit down?  Thanks. You mind if we ask you a couple of questions? Do you remember working last night?  You like numbers, too. 
 Would you do me a favor and try this? 
 It's something Roland was doodling at the home.  Besides Nollette and Keats, he's the only person we can prove was in the lab that night.  Well, you saw his facility with mathematics. Don't some autistic individuals display unusual abilities?  I don't think they'll be performing this experiment on Beakman's World.  Has this been dusted?  And worked on it for nearly 5 hours. SCULLY: Well, it couldn't have been Keats. Judging from the rigor of the body, he was dead around 12:30. So you're saying someone came in here, killed Keats, and then just did some work on an old Dr. Arthur Grable file? 
 Try 15626. 
 This is Arthur Grable's work on the same fluid dynamics equation the others were working on.  Look at all those entries. Someone has been continuing his work in the six months since he died.  Hey, Roland, you've got more shirts than I do.  I think this one would look stylin' today. What do you think?  The green one?   This one? Here you go. So you like your job at the college, Roland?  I hear you're very good at it. You remember how you got your job?  What man?  Was Dr. Grable nice to you?  When was the last time you spoke to him? Last week, the day before?  I'm sorry.  Roland Fuller was hired by Arthur Grable. He went to the halfway house specifically to find a mentally challenged person.  Well, if he had intentions of killing Nollette, Keats and Surnow, why not set it up to appear the least likely suspect?  Maybe he staged it. That would explain why his work is continuing on, six months after his "death".   Roland's also from Seattle. He spent most of his life at the Heritage Halfway House. The identity of his parents has been sealed by the courts. There's very little information on Roland before the age of three. That's when he was put in the Heritage program.   July 15, 1952.  Is that you?  Cool 'do. What's the story here?   Hmmm, an egghead classic.  Could he be making it seem like a man with a 70 IQ is gaining access to and, uh, operating his old computer files?  The police report on the auto accident that killed Arthur Grable is woefully incomplete. The dry road surface, no mechanical problems found. The body was never admitted to the county morgue and there was no funeral.  ... you'll also know how to clone new bodies for them.  These fluctuations in temperature - do they happen often?  Is it possible the brain is causing the fluctuation?  Roland Fuller and Arthur Grable had the same birthday. I think they're twins. 
 Same age, just less hairy and with better eyesight.  Close cropped hair, with a slightly receding widow's peak. Lose the glasses. 
 Give or take a few pounds. 
 Why not?   Your dreams are bad, Roland. Not you. You're a good person.  Your dreams make you hit Tracy? 
 You know how to work this toy, Roland?  Now, you see the way you work that toy is like what's happening to you. You're the spaceship, Roland, and your dreams are the controls.   Have you seen this man recently? 
  Roland! Roland! Roland, stop! 
  We need to arrange to keep Roland under observation.  He's trying to get away.  Roland! Roland! Roland! Roland! Roland! 
 Nollette's gone. We should arrange a security guard to find him.  You've got a brother, don't you Scully?  Well, have you ever thought about calling one of them all day long and then all of a sudden the phone rings and it's one of them calling you?  I believe in psychic connections, and evidence suggests that it's stronger between family members, strongest of all between twin siblings that shared the same womb.  Arthur Grable is not dead. He's in a state of consciousness that no human has ever returned from. And what if that state allows one to develop psychic ability to a potential that the conscious mind is too preoccupied to explore or believe in? He could use that ability to control his brother to kill those scientists.  Well, that's a question that only Dr. Nollette can answer.  We've got to find Nollette.  We go this way?   Identical twins.  I've read studies which suggest that in some cases the identical twin arises very early in the embryonic stage when a mutation in one cell is rejected by the other cells as foreign.  In a way, that would explain Arthur's genius and Roland's strange mathematical gift.  Nollette? (At the laboratory, Roland is operating the wind tunnel, typing rapidly on the keyboard. Roland is sweating. The temperature on Arthur Grable's tank continues to rise. The mach indicator hovers at 13.8 as Roland looks ill. He types some more on the keyboard and groans.) (to Roland) Arthur, how do you stop this? Tell me how! Arthur! (Scully moves between Roland and Mulder.) Come on, Roland.  But we've recommended that he be remanded to your custody as soon as the court deems it appropriate.  It's my belief that he wasn't acting under his own volition. (Scully gives Mulder a stare.) This is the work of Arthur Grable, Roland's brother. It's a new theory of jet propulsion, unfinished at the time of his death. In the last two weeks, Roland has completed the calculations. SEPARATOR Mulder. 
 I don't know. 
 Yeah, that's all he said.  As far as I can tell, he wouldn't pull over for a moving violation.  There's got to be something here. Some detail. Something we're not seeing. 
 Why would he do that?  I don't think he'd call if there wasn't something here... something I was supposed to see. Something he wants me to see.  Hunting a man on a moving violation?  The man in the photograph doesn't appear to be wearing a badge or a uniform. He's not one of yours?  You say the suspect was shot. Any explanation why the body hasn't been recovered? It's been almost eighteen hours, Captain. Where could the body be?  The suspect matches the description of a federal fugitive.  If you don't mind, can we take a look at the car, please?  I don't know what the hell I'm supposed to find. You can't make out the license plate in this photo.Hey, Scully, look at this. Look at the car in this photo. Look at the windshield. 
 So, probably, only a doctor would have that on his car.  I had the picture enhanced and the plate is different. "3-A-Y-F."  That's all you can make out. The rest is obscured. Hey, Danny, it's Mulder. I need you to run a Maryland plate for me. All I got is a partial. Registered to a doctor. Or used to be. Yeah, I'll hold.They switched cars on us, Scully, and they lied about it. Maybe the, uh, real owner of the car has got something to hide. Doctor Berube?  We're with the F.B.I., can we have a minute of your time?  I'm sorry. Are you aware that a car registered to you was involved in a high-speed chase in Arlis yesterday?  A silver Ciera, doctor. Do you own a silver Ciera?  A crime. Were you aware that it was even missing?  What kind of experiment?  No.  Thank you. Did he bite you? "No?" What do you mean, "no?"  Well, that's all we've got.  He's in a delicate position. He has access to information and indiscretion could expose him.  You think he does it because he gets off on it?  My mother usually likes me home before the street lights come on. 
 Why?  My level of commitment?  Well, maybe if you'd given me something more to work with.  A news report?  Not very far. 
 You know, from day one, this has always been on your terms. I've gone along. Been the dutiful son. But maybe this time, we can just cut out the Obi-Wan Kenobi crap and you can save me the trouble.  Let me tell you something. I've got plenty to do without chasing down your vague leads or trying to decode your circular logic. Maybe it's you who's become too dependent on me... on my willingness to play your games. 
 What? 
 Closer to what? 
 Suicide?  How? 
 I don't suppose there were any witnesses?  The man we met yesterday kept this place like he was waiting for the people from Good Housekeeping to show up. I would have never pegged him as someone to do all this... or a Greg Louganis out the window. 
 It's a bit too calculated, huh? Almost as if someone wanted to make doubly sure he'd break his neck before he hit the ground.What else do we know about Doctor Berube? Yeah. The mapping of all human genes. Maybe the most ambitious scientific endeavor in the history of mankind. 
 Yeah, but only one who owned a silver Ciera and went bungie-jumping with medical gauze wrapped around his neck. 
 Well, maybe that's just it. Maybe we're not seeing it because it can't be seen, not in any obvious way. What do you think this is?  Well, can you find out for me? 
 I'll see what else I can find out about Doctor Terrance Allen Berube.  Mulder.  He's alive, Scully.  The fugitive, the driver of the silver Ciera. He called the doctor's house while I was there. 
 I don't know. Where are you? 
 Is it smaller than a silver Ciera? 
 What is it? 
 Any idea what he could have been doing with them?  Well, maybe that's what he was doing with those monkeys. Can they tell you anything else there? 
 Yeah, Scully. Keep up the good work. 
 Hello. 
 I had a situation. I left my phone in the car.  Scully... 
 How soon can you be here? There's something I got to show you. It's all right, don't worry about it.  Why? Nobody else does. 
 Well, whatever it is you do believe, Scully... when you walk into that room? Nothing sacred will hold. There were tanks here and five bodies suspended in solution. There were computers monitoring them. They were alive, Scully, underwater. Destroyed by whom?  I don't believe you.  There were three men last night, I was chased.  Doctor Berube was conducting human experiments with extraterrestrial viruses.  Roswell?  That's how he was able to elude capture.  It was just easier to kill Doctor Secare.  I'm going to find Doctor Secare.  I don't know. I'm going to trust my instincts. Doctor Secare? Wait!I'll protect you.
 I'm a popular guy. Why don't you answer it for me? 